Hawaii, session 2026, SB473.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 PART I. GENERAL PROVISIONS
2 SECTION 1. SHORT TITLE. This Act shall be known and may
3 be cited as the General Appropriations Act of 2025.
4 SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS. Unless otherwise clear from the
5 context, as used in this Act:
6 "Capital project number" means the official number of the
7 capital project, as assigned by the responsible organization.
8 "Expending agency" means the executive department,
9 independent commission, bureau, office, board, or other
10 establishment of the state government (other than the
11 legislature, Office of Hawaiian Affairs, and judiciary), the
12 political subdivisions of the State, or any quasi-public
13 institution supported in whole or in part by state funds, which
14 is authorized to expend specified appropriations made by this
15 Act.
16 Abbreviations where used to denote the expending agency
17 shall mean the following:
18 AGR Department of Agriculture
19 AGS Department of Accounting and General Services
BUF-01(25)

Page 2 S.B. NO. 473
1 ATG Department of the Attorney General
2 BED Department of Business, Economic Development and
3 Tourism
4 BUF Department of Budget and Finance
5 CCA Department of Commerce and Consumer Affairs
6 DEF Department of Defense
7 EDN Department of Education
8 GOV Office of the Governor
9 HHL Department of Hawaiian Home Lands
10 HMS Department of Human Services
11 HRD Department of Human Resources Development
12 HTH Department of Health
13 LAW Department of Law Enforcement
14 LBR Department of Labor and Industrial Relations
15 LNR Department of Land and Natural Resources
16 LTG Office of the Lieutenant Governor
17 PSD Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation
18 SUB Subsidies
19 TAX Department of Taxation
20 TRN Department of Transportation
21 UOH University of Hawaii
22 CCH City and County of Honolulu
23 COH County of Hawaii
24 COK County of Kauai
25 COM County of Maui
BUF-01 (25)

Page 3
S .B. NO. <473
1 "Means of financing" or "MOF" means the source from which
2 funds are appropriated or authorized to be expended for the
3 programs and projects specified in this Act. All appropriations
4 are followed by letter symbols. Such letter symbols, where
5 used, shall have the following meanings:
6 A general funds
7 B special funds
8 C general obligation bond fund
9 D general obligation bond fund with debt service cost to
10 be paid from special funds
11 E revenue bond funds
12 J federal aid interstate funds
13 K federal aid primary funds
14 L federal aid secondary funds
15 M federal aid urban funds
16 N federal funds
17 P other federal funds
18 R private contributions
19 S county funds
20 T trust funds
21 U interdepartmental transfers
22 V American Rescue Plan funds
23 W revolving funds
24 X other funds
BUF-01(25)

Page 4 S.B. NO. 473
1 "Position ceiling" means the maximum number of permanent
2 and temporary full-time equivalent positions that an expending
3 agency is authorized for a particular program during a specified
4 period or periods, as denoted by a single asterisk for permanent
5 full-time equivalent positions and double asterisks for
6 temporary full-time equivalent positions.
7 "Program ID" means the unique identifier for the specific
8 program and consists of the abbreviation for the organization
9 responsible for carrying out the program, followed by the
10 organization number for the program.
11 PART II. PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS
12 SECTION 3. APPROPRIATIONS. The following sums, or so much
13 thereof as may be sufficient to accomplish the purposes and
14 programs designated herein, are hereby appropriated or
15 authorized, as the case may be, from the means of financing
16 specified to the expending agencies designated for the fiscal
17 biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The
18 total expenditures and the number of positions in each fiscal
19 year of the biennium shall not exceed the sums and the number
20 indicated for each fiscal year, except as provided elsewhere in
21 this Act, or as provided by general law.
BUF-01(25)

Page 5 S.B. NO. 473
**n<
O
OO000
OO00
0^00 t
— co Q «
NOC
ONC
CO —
C
Z
O
< 000 00 00 Q 000
III III III LU LU L IU LU LU LU
m m m mm 0 CD 0 CO CD CD
&
n
o
& L
n.
o
Q. LU
m
<
s
<
&
0
o
R
o
0 0
2 Z
2
<
C LU LU IU
Q. Q Z
0 O o o
O N
Q LU
n
Z
0
LU
n
O
ci ID
BUF-01 (25)

Page 6 S .B. NO
o m C 0 o
CO CM LO CM co CO C
CO CD co ID
Qi 00 co O co CXI O. 05 O CO CM L O.
9 cm' OOIC cm’ o’ CM
CM “ CO CD — - ID CO
00 ID N — CO ID CM CO
93 — 8 t C CM ID C
Z0N
O IL
Q
O 00
o
s CD CM CM CO IO CM
CD t CD CO IQ O
co co O. 05 05 ci in
cm'
CM LO co
CO ID — co LO
CM ID
CM CM
0)N
C
o
2>
92 Q 0 Q Q CCDD Q Q 0 Q Qi Qi Qi
LU LU 0 0 000000 0 0 0 0 0
uU 0 m
Q
LU
o
ne CD CM CM
CM
00 or 2 Q Qi
O LU 0 0 0 0
0
C P O
0
0
o LU Q
n Qi o
o LU O
O O o Q.
»a Q n
0 o o
0 0 O 0 O 0 0 0 O 0 L 0 U 0 LU 0 LU LU 0 o o Qi 0 LU 2 o 0 09 Qi O
R LU O LU o LU III • LU L 0 U LU
0 o o o Q O o
o o 0 O 0
Q 0 0 o 0
0 0 LU 0
LU IU
LU
0 m
LU
0 o O
□
o
Q Q
n.
0
o
LU
LU
0
RGA
ROF
GNITEKRAM
DNA TNEMPOLEVED
TCUDORP
CM
i
2
(
BUE-01 (25)

Page 7
S.B. NO.
4173
o
,0*Q * <mZ0S *0*Z*0 * < * CQ , Soz
S
O0O o co co o t o co oom
OO1OC OOCO O. O CM
QtS co “ o Q C O CO CM Q o
CO co t o N o of o’ co’ o’ N o m
OI co CM O O CO O CM co v-
CO t co • v — co v
co N o
(
Z
o
—
<
n CL *0*O « <mZ0ES * < CD « Z « Q s*m. So Z
o
C Q L O OO I N 0 O 0 O o O co O cp o N t O o co o oN o 3©5 o oo m cm o cCo o m N' c — 0o
O. +OeO G&ot9c
< co co L O CM co’ o) o’ co o’ co’ — C m o co
o m o CM O O CO O CO I v m
CO — C - — v co • — ON
co" o r — cm" in
C
2
o
<
Z Q Q Z Q Z 0 < Q 0 < Q 0 < Q 0 < D 0 < Q 0 < Q 0 < 0 0 < 0 0 < 0 0 < 0 C s 0 C 0 C 0 Q 0
c
Q.
o
&
a C.
CL 0 <
<
s
<
&
O
o
R
o
0 0
Z— 2
s
LU
CL
O o o
O
U
0
BUF-01(25)

Page 8 S.B. NO. 473
— u
5 2 o I o m co *
cd O O (O o
8 co C C tn O M I s 8 D t O © 8 C in M c c . o o i o n ’ C C • M M . o CM C C c S M O I D O o o ' i co I N D I C D C c C s M M o o O O i . C c in o M "
N O) — CM C CM
in CM' cm’
o
088
S@2°
2
&u
8Q o t CD
o 05 O
ID O in C ID o — O in
c 9 o 8 s 8 O cm C P O O C C M O - CM cd C C co M O “ C O o M ' I c L O o ' i Q n i C n M c CM o m 05 C co M " oo
US O. — O. CO N
>-CM in cm' -f o CM ' cm" cm"
— i
<CM
OO
CO CM
CO
z
O
2>
92 Q Q 0 0 o o o Q DC o o 0
0 0 0 UJ UJ Ul UJ 0 0 Ul Ul Ul
g5 < < < m co CD CO < < co co CD
LU
Q. s s C O M . in CM
n
00 Q. Q Q Q
O 0 L CO U 0 L C U O U CO l
o
Q U C l o s
ct
o a o
o co Q Q
LU
o
or — R. O
0 —
< Z
Q UJ
O S
Q
— UJ UI o
0 z Z LU Q S . 0 2 z Ul in LU 0 Z o — 0 Z LU
— = O s 2 Q S u
< 5 2 Q s o
C 0 o DC R 0 z Q < s S o U o Q z I U > W Z I U O 0 0 0 • U > L z U J ) l L O n U LU - Q 2< J o U > L Q L Z — — Q U U D J I O L Q U . 0 Q Z > o L Z U < 0 U J r 0 x U Z U U — A > J J I U 0 o J . 0 o o Z X O U Q > J
Ul 0 D o 0)
z n W O
UI 0 UJ o
0 Q z
UJ X
X o
0) UI
LU
< — UJ 00 CM
0
BUF-01 (25)

Page 9
S.B. NO. 473
,<mO * t < $ mo Z0
ONOOO0 o o
OOO0IO o o
— CQ— 0 t o o o
NO) OO o' o'
O OOO o o
s OO — o
co N co co"
* < * C — O * : < * * m O Z Q
ONOOOO 88
o co o co I o
— C — C s O
C CO N o O o' o'
O OOO o o
n OO - o
co" N co co"
C
z
O
<
CCDD. Q 00 Q Q
Z22 LU LU IU LU LU
&
0 CQ CD CD CD
n
o
C o
10
Q.
Q.
<
5
<
&
0
O
ft
n.
0
2
LU IU
Q Q
o O
CM
BUF-01(25)

Page 10 S.B. NO. 473 5
tso o
to
: § o
co
Z
O
2
Q O
LU 111
« m m
n
o
or
a
o
<
2
<
C
O
O
I
n.
E
<
Q
O
O
K
a.
o
LU
C
5202
,5
yraunaJ
BUF-01 (25)

Page 11
S .B. NO
O * C
E
O
1 in m o cm
DC NI, CO in in
CM 310 in s 10
CM in in
CO in CO o) ID
co' co' C co
8
90S
200
Q ,
0 * 0
O s c CM o § ID O O c CM o §
%o N CM C “ D In 3 L CD O i m n 00 CO 00 co ID o (D
8 L co m
o ID cm' CM CO co'
— ID
IC
O ©
0N
C
z
o
2-
=0
7u DC DC ac Q Q Q. DC Q DC oc dc . DC DC
CD CD m cd CD CD CD CD CD 0 CD CD CD CD
Wo
o
m
co 8
X
00 DC DC DC
OT CD CD CD CO
DC
O
O
ne
o
Z 0
0 O CD
o DC UOI
o CL
2 X LU 0 — U Z I 0 U O 2 I 0 R LU ( o
< O Q S S s C 0)
Q CL
0 DC o O 0 UI L Q o U o UI O U CL I 0 C Z D D O LU . O U CL I C<D
D O C E > U 0 I u 0 — L Z U o L I D U C
LU UI 2 O 0<
O O
U > I D O Q C O C L O u X D o D C C D O Q y D C C O 0 Q S UI O u o L U U o O o —< Z
o O
n
S
O LU
UI
— CD
s SO
ci t
OT
BUF-01(25)

Page 12 S B. NO.
473
« < CD * < * * 0. *<*-
o v- o O000O 0000—
0 6 0 Q O Q N O O OW 8w O © C E OO r O i L "
NNO C CO o
O 5 I o ID
t co co CO
co" -f
* < —
Q C QQ QQ
CD CD CD CD CD CD
NOITACIDUJDA
ROBAL
ID
2
(U
3
C
C
BUF-01 (25)

Page 13 S B. NO
o 4 4 4 co *
=
CXI
CXJ CO CD L
R 8 CO C C O D CXI C o 5 ’ 00 Q
CM CXI
N CM"
—c
038
Z00
Qu
3
Yu m *
20
&=
8 CM o —
CO CM CO CD O - W
CO CM 0) CM O co" O Q C C M O
o Q O
CM CXI
CM"
—
<CM
os
ON
tn
Z
o
2>
9 uU 2 Q CD . CO C Q D Q co c Q o Q CD o co r
Q
Q.
O
CM CM
DC co CO CD O O .
(0 m Q DC DC
o- co CD CD CO
Q
Q
C
Q
<
0 O
co
O
0
o
Q
R 0
< Z
o 0 O 0 0 0
m Z 2 0 Z
R 0 o Z — < D LU C L Q U — < L Q U C o Q Q O — 0 — — < L Q U o LU
0 5 O < Q O . 3 0 s O Q. O Q
o LU DC 0 0
n R n — 0 D s S Q Z S
o a 0 Q
0 5 z o
Q
o A
Q <
s o LU LU
m 0 Z
LU LU
LU O' 0
o
O
LU
— uO
S CM
0
85fo
9
5202
,5
yraunaJ
BUF-01 (25)

Page 14 S.B. NO. 473
m « : CD LU Z m.tmuz m.tmuz m *
OOOsO
NOOt0
QNuO C
CO(OwtOO
O CD — CD
CO OP
Ma*mu2 0*0 m* * QUZ
-OO CD O 8 O. o o
N IO —. N - O ci O O O o
— CO N co o’ —
00 O co o
C CD t O
o' m’ cd'
C CM
in
CM
o
CM
i
2
co
co
BUF-01 (25)

Page 15
S.B. NO. 473
o CO tn 0 LU 2 0 tn co * m m * m lu CO to
=
CO co 0) + o CM o
Qi o co 0 C 0 O co C Q D u O C T O C O M .
8 — — co o5 CD — X o’
co IQ i * C CO O to co CO O. I N D
N co" 1 co
— CD to
©38
E0N
O U
<
Ru
20 CO m CO UI m co * co m * CO UI CD
00 co to o o o) — o CM o 8 CD
o co O. m o co io o CM
00 P. CM N ID CM CD
to co o 6
to IO CD CM
1
co cm" io' co CM
“t to
CO CM
W
Z
O
2>
52
uU Q Q Q Q Q Q O Q oi Q C Q Qi Q
C
Q.
O
n CO t c o o to
Qi
0Q Z Z
O Q Oi Q ( Q
Qi
co CO co co
— 2 z z z
UI UI UI Ul
S
C
>
O <
Q
o Ul Ul Ul LU
ne c < o 0 C < O 0 a
Ul Ul
_I J —
Qi Qi Qi Qi
0 0 0 0
O O O Q
0 0 0 0 0 0 0 ( 0 0 0
2 Z Z Z UI Z z Z Z Z 2 UI Z
— — — 2 — a — 2 s S —
< < A s s & < — A
Qi Q co Qi Qi 0)
Qi Ul Lu Ul Ul LI Ul Ul Ul Ul LU LU LU Ul
O O o 0 Q O . Q O . Q O . Q O Q o Q O - Q o O Q
Q C o o Q o Qi Q n l—
o Q c Q t . o Q Q R O Qi
Q Q < Q.
< n $ . Q
<
o O d 5 z <
$ $ s
to
N
o
N
w
o
2
I L - U C 2 o
A LU CM C
io CD CO
CO
BUF-01(25)

S.B. NO. 473
,mmuzX m.mmzo CD « m
OONNGO NONOH co O.
— 0. CM CD Q o s w o co —
co • CD O CM O CM
* QUZX O*Q020 0 * CO
Ow0000
ONOOOO
LU
m
Q
<
co
o
LU
S
$
CO
BUF-01 (25)

Page 17
S.B. NO. 473
o 0 Q CO CO CD Q co co * 0 Q. CO QZ0
S
ID — o 05 O CO
CM O. o N v- Q
or O co o CM . cd co C.
18 co" CM CM i "
O. CM O. CO O)
O. 0) ID
— / C t XI $ cm'
038
Z0N
Ou
2
Ru
8Q 0 or co * co co or co co co co co C co co or CD «
s co 8 CD co o
o O — o
co CM C 1
to i
CO ID to LO
LUOO CO
>C
—
IC
00O0
0.
2>
92
or or or or or or or or or or or or or or or or or or or
uU
Q
Q.
O
or co
CO 8 co
co co co
0Q Z Z 2
O or or or or
or
co 0 co CO CO
— — — — z
Z Z 2 Z
LO LL LU 10 10
or
0
LO LO 1O LO LO
CO CO CO CO CO
< < § < <
LO LO LO LO
— — —
or or of or of
o 2 O o D O D O o D O D O
H
z 0 C z 0 0 0 0 o 0 7 0
LO 2 2 LO z Z Z Z 10 z Z z
S 2 — S a — — — 2 — — s
— < — s < < s 2 s
co or or CO or or co CO
to LO to LI. io LO LO LO LI LO LO LO LO
O o or o o Q. C o L o o x c o < o r r O D. C O L o O C o D r r Q o C o L o C o X < 3 D r o Q O Q o c X o Q < o r C O L
CD IO
or §
<
L
o
$ $
L
CXI
o
CXI
w
O
10 2
— 3 CO
s LL C
CM (
co
BUF-01 (25)

Page 18
S.B. NO
o amza CO * CD *Omza * ID m Q 0 m 0 LU
O N O O O O O O LO O C L O 0 O ^ . - O 0 o 0 o 0 0 io 5 co
CO_ O O O CO — 1 —Q&9 C C
co" N -f f N N — 0y -f -f co
— m o o m cm — m O 05 . co C co N
LO
—t CM O.
938
Z0N
O LL
CD CO 2 Q cn 0 CO Q CO CO Q CO CD LU 2
O
LO 10 s
CM CM CD S 10
00 LO CM oi CM LO CO
co CM" co" C) 00
• O. 10 1
L — II C o M t O. CM 10 CD CO CM
> 4 CM f of CM CM v- O.
IC
0OON
O
2>
92
Qi Qi O' Qi Qi Qi Q Qi Qi Qi Qi Qi O' Qi O Q oi Q DC
uU
O'
LU
(. 10
CO to
Qi CO CO
00
O- Q Qi Qi Qi Qi
Q
0 0
LU LU
Q. 0
LU
O
o LU UJ
0 Qi 0
UJ
0 UJ
n o
Qi
O O 0 O O
LU
0 0 0 0 ( ( 0
LL LU LU UJ
o
0 Qi 0 0 Qi Q 0
Qi UJ LU LU LU Qi UJ UJ LU UJ UJ LU LU LU
0 O O Q. o C m O o O m Qi O CD O O O O O ()
O' CD
Qi
Q
Q O o
IU 3 0 m n 0 0 0
Qi
o
0
Qi Q
O 0
o
S
i
2
LU co
UJ lO CM CM C CM O c co
C
BUF-01(25)

Page 19
S.B. NO. 473
o CD * OUZ CO « * CD CO UJ 2 CD * CD UJ Z < * * m 2 CD LI Z W
O*00 co o o o O o CD O CO O O o o
OOIOOO O O O CD O o — O CO o o q q — CO CM
Q 00 o O O Q st o — 0 O o 8000 — co CM
o) — o o’ o’ CD O D o’ o’ co’ CD N o’ o’ CXI L
LS OwIOO O. CO o o eq co o o in
- o oq N co I V- st CM s CM co
w -f o) & -f t o’
C v- — CM C
QOS CM
Z0N
Qn
Q
m CO LLI 2 co CD CD LU 00 CD LU LU 0
O
ID O 8
CO ID O. O. CM
ID CO ID CM
O. ID
<0 05 O ID
CO CM
ID CM co
CM CM CM CM CM ID
CM
CD CM
CO
0
92
uU Q. DC DC DC Di DC DC DC DC Q dc or Qi Qi CDDDR
UJ
Q L
O.
ID ID ID ID ID
00
OT Qi D Q. Q Q
R
0 CD CD
IU UJ LU
C
O
o UJ UJ UJ
OH 0 0 0
Q Q
o O o O O O
0 0 Z 0 0 Z 0 0 0
Z Z UJ Z UJ LU o LU
2
( 0 u U 0 0
C IU IU L LU LU UJ LU UJ LU
0 O O o O Q. 0 o C
o
0
R 0 UJ
Q
0
0 0
0
0
S
0 O
$
5
O
LU
LU CO
CM CM
0
BUF-01(25)

Page 20
S.B. NO. 473
85
fo
61
5202
,5
yraunaJ
BUF-01(25)

Page 21
S.B. NO. 473
L
o
S
or
Woo C
Z00
O ,
,**.tns **
O
Q o O O O I U D O 0 O O N O. c CO
Q oOo.©Q
< 00. 1 co
CM (DO)
N t
o c
M
Z
O
<
Q Q. Q
0 0 0
c < < <
Q.
O
m O
st 8
n CO
X Q
a — 0
< X
2
<
&
O
O
R
n
0
2
m
CM
o
N
i
2
cc
co co
BUF-01 (25)

Page 22
S.B NO. 4173
o CD O o
0 eo 0
CM in O. 0 in CM 0 3
Q O o -ci CD in c t o T — O 03 m C CM O - ID CD —
CM co co 00 o CO
in C to CM TO — CD
0' cm" C
C
P0S
Z0N
or
CQ * ( O
Os
2
0 NIOO ID
CM in 00 w in 0 o CM t 3
O “ in o.c co - m
CD CM co
CM co CD CM co m CM v CM
u& in CM 00 0 in CM
in CM co
— CO
00
oO
CO
0
—O
□T C Q Q Q Q OT Q Q. Q Q Q Q. Q Q Q
68
C
O
m
00 Q D
O
or
Q
0
O
Q
O
LU
O
O 2
Q LU
O
or
o
O R O O LU
0
0 a—P U&J 0 0 LU 0
2 LU LU
Q
C Z 0 Q 0 o or
or LU LU LU LU IU 0 LU
20 LU
0 o — LU o Z — ( LU o or o
O O O o
n or K
3 o
o O
0 0
LU LU
or or Q
or LU
LU 0
< o
o
LU
LU
in
0
BUF-01(25)

Page 23
S.B. NO. 473
SNOITAIRPORPPA
MARGORP
)1(1A
IIAWAH
FO
ETATS
SNOITAIRPORPPA
FOM
RAEY
LACSIF
FOM
RAEY
LACSIF
GNIDNEPXE
MARGORP
MARGORP
METI
_________7202-6202______________6202-5202_________YCNEGA_______DI________________________________________________________________ON co ID
Z050 * $ < m Z * Q. o ♦ * < * t m * Q Is**Z** o
0.
OOxtOOOOO OIOIOPL
OO000 ONOIIC
o—006 Q Q o — CO - d • — oi
CO TOO O o CM 00 21
CO co t OO
01 QO co —
o co t co
ZA50 * t <A2* nO **<**m:0 **<**Z*%
OwO OOO0000 OOwOONOC OIOUONLI
r O I o OOOOw0O OOCOONOC ONOICOIC-
CO o C o_ oO&s Q Q QSE00 o — C — d L — cxi
CO CD ci o’ co t o O O o in — cm L cxi N co P *
U000 co co o o — I CO
Or- CO ©—“ O o o st C co —
co’ d co id N co’ co’
l
BUF-01 (25)

Page 24
S.B. NO. 473
85
fo
02
5202
,5
yraunaJ
BUF-01(25)

Page 25
o o
CM
Q
9
— ©
038
Z00
O ,
Q
Q. D o 0
O
co co CD 8 8 I $ D 2 O CD CO CM O.
ID CM CO co CD O.
C CM O CM CM CM i m n CM * CM CM
co' C co O ' 10 CD CO CM c o m ’ i C N O
CM
aN
0
o
2>
92 0
0
uU
Q.
O
n co
Q
0Q
O
Q
(
0 0
n
0
Q. 0
>
0 0
o LU
Q
O
or
O ca
o
0
oa 0 Q 0 oa 0
o L 0 U LU O 0 u
IU < O
0 < L 0 U LU 0 LU L Q U 0 I Q U
LU a Q Q. Q
0 LU O C o O o
O 0 Q 0
n L O U LU 0 < LU
Q 0 O o
2 O < O L 0 U O Z
0 < LU
L 0 U 1 O U 0 I 0 Q
O 0 IU
O
LU
LU
LU
UI
LU
LUS
0
SECIVRES
HTLAEH
YLIMAF
O
CM
ID
2
(o
3
C Co
BUF-01 (25)

Page 26
S.B. NO. 473
O * CD * * O
=
o CO 00 CO O O CO
a ID ID ID ID tLL ID CD o
8 O c C o D . ' — — OJ C ID O O. 00 O C 9 D . — ID CM ID CD C — . C “ D c cm’ CM 5 t O
CO CD ID CM
N ID cm’
938
Z0N
Qu.
—
st
Ru
CD
s
CO 00 CO 00
LD ID ID ID U CD
O. _ CM CO 0 0 ID CD CM CO CM 1 CM
o
O.
— I
C
D
O
CD
O
o
.
v
C
5 CM
CM O. L
id’ CD
ON
C
z
O
2>
92
uU
o
ID
C ID D O ID . I O D . ID
00
O
Q
o S
S
O O D
o Q U 0 J
C
n
o
n
UI —
X z
oa o
Z 0
( p ( ( 0 m 0
— Z Z
z S —
Q <
0 Q O L Q U L Q Q U L Q o U < 0 LU o L Q Q U U Q O J .
o L 0 U O Q p
( 1 • Q
o UJ
( 0) =
O LU
U Q o
Z LU
o Q
Q LL
X LL
O o ID
CM
O
CM
D
o
2
LU 05
— □
s LU ID CO C CO
0
BUF-01(25)

Page 27
S.B. NO. 473
co
cn * tn < o
000 CQ O < * C O
o o
o o
m o
N o’
in o
— co
o in
V)
z
o
s
K
a
O
Qi
Q.
n
<
2
<
Q
O
O
R
Q.
O
O
N
in
o
2
LU
CD
CD
BUF-01(25)

Page 28
S.B. NO. 473
* CD $ O CO t m
o CD co o m o CO ID o o i i n n O o c C o D O.
Q 8
10 —
cd C c c
r
o o "
1
o o
0
' 00
10
c & o u c
C
m
M
" 0 ID CD —
c
•
o
a CM 5 c
c
m
d
" © O
CO
. ci
C
O
O
.
C
00 CO co I co co CM
— oN co' — C f in co" cm' cm"
038 O. — C
622°
2
&u
8Q92 CO O CD
Q iCoD co 5 m o CD ID m m o o co C O M .
Q < . 3 CN C C M M " C CM D < 00 . 3 o I o D ) co 0 — o CM O © . c O.
18 O in L co CD co CM
CO O o (O CO CM
— Ot cm' o co' CO IO' CM'
< CM
(JO
00
0
2>
92 0
0
uU
C
3
Q to
00
O
0
o
LU O o
— ( C
0 2 0 L Z U > Z 0 0 Z L
0 R —< L Q o Q U L O Q U — C L 5 J D m Q L 0 < U s L o C U L Z L S LU U — L C o < Q U L m < ( Q
O 0 O _1
n 0 0 A
Q LU
Q d Z
IU
LU o _J Q < S Q.
O c O
r
o Q — LU
U i
Q I
O O ID
CM
O
CM
10"
2
LU CO
s 3
LU ID CO C Co
0
BUF-01(25)

Page 29
BUF-01 (25)

Page 30
S.B. NO 4173
Z Z o
O 0 0^-000
LQ OO ID O O CD O O O
co 00 i C ID 1 ID — C 00 O C.
co 3 CM t — O CM ID
ID CM CD CM V- ID P
CM CD ID O. C
cm' — ID
CO
? t 0 * * * < * : Z
s
CD O O O ID O O Q
LO CO O ID O O -- Q O O
C—O ,ID O CM 9 ID L ID — CO O C.
O. & CM N - - CM ID
ID CD CM
CM ID 00 N
ID" id'
CO
O (
Z Z
LU LU
CL CL
O
2.
(
□
ID c
CM CM (
BUF-01(25)

Page 31
S.B. NO. ^13
85
fo
72
5202
,5
yraunaJ
BUF-01(25)

Page 32
S.B. NO
o
m
=
X 18 N c I o c D d o ID c I o 8 D o 0 I • D f 0 I O C I D D M ) c O d . 0 C 1 o3 X 0 c I 0 c o o 0 CO m C 0 I C C D M 0 D D ' ID C — v — c O o I i c m — n D o " ID o i o 0 n 0 i 6 n 1 I C 8 v D O
— « 8 co" cm" co" - o5
m cd
988
Z00
Ou
—
<
Ru J
CD
89
2
in I o D C O - C ID O M f in I C O I D D M . O CO . 1 o C c XI c 0 O C 0 O c I I % O D D o " C L co - — C C — O t P i C L n o D 8 3 8 o ID I O C D Xl"
ID m co
—
< CXI
OS
ON
C
Z
o
2>
92 ( 0) 05 0s 0
5
0
2
0
S
0
S
0
2
0
S
0
2
0
2
uU X X X X X X X X X X
R
a.
O
n C o I O D
co CO ID
00 CD 0 CD CD CD
S
OT
Q
Q
CD
0 Z
o L
n 1 — 11 C — D
L > U LU L Z U 0 3
o3 A &
0) LL
LL Q 0
c LU o 0 0 Z C LU O 0 Z < O 0 Z O DC 0 2
O O 2 o 2 — 0
a & < LU
D O O C C < D Q D L C L > U U O L O C U L R O L — D L. L Q O Q U . . L C L > U U O L O Q Q U . o L C L T Q L C o U L O > U 0 Q J o 1 L C o Q U L
DC > — o Q. — — X
0 Z O LU Q • O LU o Q 5
C O R L O U o CD o a Q Q . c s o o o Q r Q 1 C Q O 3 . o > y 0 o O
LU L O U L Z U o I CO n
5 CO > Q x O I 0 U < o
< < LU
x Q CD
o O
CO
LU
2 u9
oi ID
0
RETNEC
SSENLLEW
YLIMAF
DNA
HTUOY
AOLIAWAK
CM
ID
2
CD
3 C
CD
BUF-01(25)

Page 33
S.B. NO. 473
o O Q CD
LO CO O. CO CO C co D C I C O O
io O.
Q C 0 M 5 C CD CD ID CO O. LO w
CM — CO CM
co CO CO CO CO
— © C co' CO
038
Z0N
O ,
Fu
O CD
89
02
8 co § CO CD C co L) s CM C C D O
ci CM CO O. LO co w o o 2 m t
u& CO CM CO CO CM co CM co o
CO
CM LO co co' CO
CO CM
ON
CO
o
(
52 CO CO co co co co co co 0 co 0 ()
IU L LU
uU Q O
o
n co CM C o M
o 0 r 0 co co 0 CM 0 CM C 0 M 0 CM
O LU
ar Q
O
UJ
C 0 O
LU 0
O O 0
LU
O or LU co co
Q UJ
0
2 Q LU co co I 0 U
IU
O 0 LU Q U 2 J LU 0 LU
0 0 or LU 0 0 0 0
2 LU LU O 0 O
O CD LU LU
Q LU — 0 LU 0 LU 0 D LU L 0 U 0 0 L Q U O D LU C O a LU O Q Q LU
O O Q Q O . 2 Z L L Q U U o L O U U J o O 0 O Q 0 0 0 O Q o 0 0 0 o 0 0 0 O a o r O
o
0 O Q CD 0 Q CO
LU 0 o LU LU
0 LU LU 0 UJ U 0 J L O U 0
U a J r Q Q o CD
0 0 CM
0
CM
CD
o 2
LU CD
CM
LL CO CO O. (O
0
BUF-01(25)

Page 34
S.B. NO
o t
S
CD o CO
9 1 ID CM
ct L C
s 8 co co’ CM ID"
co CM CO in
o CO L CO CM I
—Oc 5 N ID In
938 CM
62°
2
Pu
O CO CD CO ID
m No C C O O O r . i C n D 0)
1 CM
8 9 CO v c — in
co ID CO
I — > O o CM $ coo C w M O co C s D ID O.
— t CD CM
< CM
0OON
2>
92 CD CD CD CD CD CD CD CD CD CD co 0
uU
o
ft O.
CM 8 CM
CM CM
00 CD C CD 0
OT
CH
A0
R
d
O
O
Q
0 LU
O LU S
0 H O c
LU 0 Z 0 2 0 0
O LU 2 Z Z —
R
2 <
LU
> Q L
0
U .
LU
— C
L
2
U
D O
L
< Q
U
L
O
0 L U U — < o
LU
r 0 LOU 2
L
Q
U
Q 0
R
Z
O O Z 0 2 Q O . C O L $ Z o Q. R o Q Q LU
o s 0 CD 0 LU 0
Q CD Z 0 0 m
0 0 O S 0 0 0 L Q U 2
< 0 Q L u U O < 2 Z
Z 2 S
0 LU LU O o
0 Q or O
O
m
CM
o
N
o in
2
LU co
s •
LU C ib co C (
CD
BUF-01(25)

Page 35
L
CM
O
CM
i
2
CO
CO
BUF-01(25)

Page 36
S.B. NO
o * Z * CD * o
=
CM 1 — o ID O
8 P o ID O
n co O CO 0 cd ® ci
CM
C
CM
O C5M
LO C
c
C
m
O
' LO
CM
c
C
o
O
CO v O CM
X w CM*
Q06 C
Z0N
Ou
—
<
Fu
8292 CD t O CD
Q o CM L ID
Q < r O -f co c C o O ' C L O 6 cm' co co ‘ L O - co C c LO o O ' CO
CM CM C. L. CM co co CM C 00
o CD CM
8 i CM cm'
CM
0N
CO
Z
o
2>
52 E
uU
o
CM L
O CM CM
Q CD L
(Q
OT
n
0
—
Z
IU
C Q
O Q 0 < Q
o s D I 0 U 0 LU O m
n 8 O 0
0
LU > IU
2 O O 0 0 O L 0 s Q U O O < 0
H Z
0Z
L
2
U
0
2
O
o
0
Z
0 o 0
C 0 Q O — < C L Q O U L — 0 L S U L 0 O < Q 2 U . o I C Q U L — < L O Q Q U . 0 o Q 0 < o I Z U Q O LU . 2 o I o Q U
O o
Z
or O 0 L LU L O O
o Q O 0 S O > 2 o
0 Q
Z 0 5
2 Z m
Z O <
s S LU 0
Q
LU □ ID
CM
O
O CM
ID
O
2
LU (
— 5
S LU co CM C 1 M 0 to C Co
0
BUF-01(25)

Page 37
S.B. NO
o C i t
O o ID co
ID 2 CO in ID ID C ID CO ID
2 in CO LO CO C o co
ID O ID ID c CO co
US 88 co CO st
N C
CO co" — CO in O. co"
— CD O. os —
©88
622°
2
&u
89 0 * O
Q4
ID CO N CD C C O O ID § co C O D . O ID . C ID O — “ CM so ID co
04 ID 8 ID C ID O CO 2 ID ° — CO co" Q N o c a o s '
CO CM 9 1o0 CO O c N o N
co" — w co'
O ID CD
0)N
O
z
O
2>
92 CD CD CD CD CD CD CD 0 CD CD 0 0
wU
o
ne C
8 CD O) O.
00 0 0 0 0 CD
O
0
2 z
o
< C C — Z D 0 LU — D _I
0 LU O o
> 0
O L n U W LU 0
0 O z
LU > O > Q 0 D
Z LU o
UJ 0 I
0 O LL 0 0 x Q 0 O H Z < O ( < a z
X 2 z LU O 0
0 u 2 Z o S 0 0 LU
C 0
O n
O —
C o
O o H l I . _ L 0
o L
n U
L
I Q L o Q U
0 z
L o Q R U C LU D o
o
n L
Q
L L o Q U . Z 0 0 L —
L 2
U
U
I
6 — Y Q 5 D Q. o X
0 O < 0 Z
CL
a Q X < Q A o LU
LU 0 LU LU O
Z Z Z Z LL
LoU LU LU LU
0 0 0 o LO
CM
O
CM
w
o
2
LU ra
— D
< o LU C CM O C . C as
BUF-01(25)

Page 38
S.B. NO. 473
====== ================== co
o
co
O
2
O
2
Q
n
o
&
n
a.
<
C
O
O
or
0
2
2
st
Q LU
O
o
o
Q
n
L
C
o
N
i
o
2
LU ro
cj
co C
0
BUF-01 (25)

Page 39
S.B. NO. 473
o t co o S o
m
CM 0.O. L Q LO CM
or Q C C C Q co CO < C CO Lc
UN O. CO o) — on C in D 888 c C o D C C N N co L co m LO co
CM ( 0 O L O O N CO co" d o in - l C D M CN m c LO n
CO CM CN O.
Q08 ID
59°
'—'ll
Q
CO O
L m LO ID CO s in cm
CD CO cd od CQc CM 8 C in D ©ci
cn in co in
CM ONO in v- CO CM
— co
CN w- O.
CM CM CM in
0 CM
tn
0
o
U O Q Q Q Q Q Q Q Q Q Q O Q O
LB UJ UJ LB UJ LU LU LU LU LU LU UJ LB LU LB
X
LB
o
in
CM
00
O Q Q
Q LU LB LB
0
LB
R
R LU
0
0
C
o
D
0
o in
0
0 0 0
o IB 0 Q
LU O
00
0
Q o Q Q LB 0 LB o LB LB
0 O LU m o o 0 O
o
LB
O o 0 Q o
O m LU
O
O LB o
O o O
a Q UJ Q o UJ 0
LU n 0 0
UJ LU
Q in
O
Q
O m
o
UJ
0
uO
CD
0
BUF-01(25)

Page 40
C
i
2
CO
3
C
CO
BUF-01(25)

Page 41
S.B. NO. 473
o CD t 0
=
co 00 m
O m CO 00 CO CM O co 05
X O) CM N« ©c O
co’ CD Q CD co' CM O. in in o'
US co (D O co CM 00 o t
CD o O in
o in co' CO cm"
C CD C
Q0S m to
Z0N
O 1
m C
O
LD co co CM O. 00 8 co
CD - CD 00 ID
0 CM CD O CD ©ci co CM
CO 8 co ID in w
as CD CM co CM CM co in CD
o co CO O. in — CO CM CD
+ CM in in co
in
QN
CO
2
o
0
92
uU Q L Q UJ Q UJ Q Ul Q LU Q UJ Q Ul Q LU Q UJ L Q U Q LU Q UI U Q l co co co
O
ne CM in m m
or CD S L co CM
0 0 Z Z. u 5
O Q Q Q D 0
x Lil Ul UJ co CD CD
C o
z
LU
CD
□ Z
O L C A U D < o 5 o — CD
DC
_I o UJ I—
d o Z o Q UJ C Q D
0 O
O 0 Ul CD Q O
CD
o z
0 Z 0 2 S ( 0 2 o 0 Z UJ O 0 — 0 2 0 <
—< o o — < CD — < U Z J
R CD U Q I LU 0 —1 LU U Q J U U l X UJ Ul D Ul o CD
0 O X O o T o CD O X Q o o o O X 0 O Q 0 n Z 2 C o L U m — z U Z J l O Q Ul Q O . L O & U Q O . 0 X U z s l
U X J D LU C L S U U 0 I c Q
DC X Q —
< C CO O
X LU o
o Q Q X
o
0 ID
CM
O
CM
ID
o
2
UJ
2
LU CM
5 O.
BUF-01(25)

Page 42
S.B. NO
O CD O * 5 O m
=
ID ID ID LO CM CD in o CD
R CD tD CM I Q D c ) CO CM ID C c O o . O id c 1 o O 00 m o
' 8 ID co' C ID D CM I 0 D 0 I I CM CO o CO c in m' co C 0 co 5 CM
O. CO 00 O. in co in
— C d cm' CM co" <6 C C O D 5 co" in I C D M
988 CM
Z00
Qu
—
<
8 Y Q u O O CQ « 5 O
CO ID 1 ID in CM CD ID O 0)
C
O
D I
C
D
O
CM
O
ID CD C
C
M
M
CD CM
CM
C
0
D O
ID
C1D OCO I
O
D
O.
CO CO co CO ID' CM O CD CM ) CO CM CD o
Uo o) co ID L O 0 C 0 O C s O O O O cm' I L D CO C ID O CM
to cm' co’ CD’ 1O ID
— t CM CD
< CM
00ON
C
Z
O
2>
92 0 0 0 0 Q Q Q 0 0 LU LU UJ o o O O O
uU LU LU LU Q 0
C
n
O
Q 00
0 O 0 0 Q LU o o
LU Q
Q
DC UJ 0
Q Ul
O < 2
O o d
<
0
LU
0 0
2 Z
UJ Q
d
O _ < I O O m
0 0 H Z I o 0 H Z o 0 — Z
Z L i Z LU UI
C — L n < U LU u 5 0 i — o > — < U Q J 2 — 0 LU UJ 1 0 L S — U O
0 Q o o Q Q n o Q. Q o
O 0 <
n Ul
o < r: 0 o — o o
Q < 2 2
m o
D 0 CD
o Q Ul C UJ L Q U
- m J n
UJ
X ID
0 CM
O
CM
i
O
2
Ul TO
— •
— < LU id co C TO
CD
BUF-01(25)

Page 43
S.B. NO. 473
t*m.z
LO OOoNO OON(0t
O OIOIO00C O0010
to GEQON O —Q08N
CO “ (OONIO
LQ C ONOOO
COCO in
co N ci - o’ m’ f
C! N cd N
« t < . m z « So , : <mzso * * < m * Z
OOOONONO OO0o)O O O I CD O CD
NOIOO000 OIOOO00O O0010
UEY+ C O CM • Q GONONQ — CD O O 6 O
co o co co co O o — co co’ ci N o’ NOO CO
L • co d co o C OONOOO CO O in CXI
co Ns tO o o co o m — O. CD t
O N N to co’ ci ci CD o’ in f
10 ■sr v- CM CM O. N
C
z
O
<
X X X X XX XX X X X X X X XXX
o o o O O O O O O OOOOO OOO
Of D D D D D D D D X D D DD D XXX
a
O
&
a
DL
<
s
<
&
0
o
&
o
X
X
<
o
2
<
or LU LU
0 Q Q
o o
O
&
0
o
in
CM CM
C
85
fo
93
5202
,5
yraunaJ
BUF-01(25)

Page 44 S.B. NO. 473
BUF-01(25)

Page 45
S.B. NO. 473
LL.
o *<*O*Z0 , < « CD
S
ONOIOL
OOO00N
womr’
O CO -
NOL
OP
D
n * < * CD 5 * * •* ZMO * < « CD * Z0 * C * CD
o
o
C 5
CL O IIO (O N I I O N I O O I I O O
Q<. — W «o — — W - Q
IO O I o o
co co OIC
NOO
O N —
C
Z
O
2>
< 92 XXX 00000
OOO OO000
c uU DDD <s
Q.
LU
o
n CM
co O
Q. Q co CO co
00 x DC Q
O O 0
< QC D
2
<
Ct
0
O
n
n.
0 0 0
2 Z
2
<
DC
Ct LU LU
0 Q
O o O
o
R
n
<
DC
<
0<
O
LU
BUF-01(25)

in
o
in
N
o
CM
i
2
CO
5
c
CD
BUF-01 (25)

Page 47
S.B. NO. 473
O
S
ID 05 ID CM
Qi C1 05 o CD 00 1 00 C CO D
N CD w ID o CM c m m" CO L i C CM O
CO
u of
0qS
82°
2
Yu
8292
ID O LO co
O. in
C f C 0 M 5 C CM CO 0 i 0 I O D CM 0 c 0 o co’
CD ID CM ID m C
O 00 CD
co' w
•10
0< OCM
00
(
Z
o
Q Q Q Q Q Q Q
58 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0
o
n ID CO CO
O O o
t S 3
00 Q Q Q Q Q
O 0 0 0 0) 0 0 0
Qi
0 0
— —
z 2
LU LU
Q Qi U — J
o O o E L 0 < U U J E — Z L O U _ o Z U I I O Q U — Z LU J i U — Z O a Q U I I i L 0 L < U U Q U Z U o _ < J J I i Z L O < z o U
O 0 Z — O 0 o 2 Q L — Z U i o o — 0 2 Q Q D O < i i 0 z — < Qi E Q 0 Z < Qi o — o 0 z — < Di I O Q O O o L Q — U i i 0 Q Z < i o 1 O < Z U Q Q O — J i i 0 Z o — o L Q O O Q U i z Q o 0 — < Q i i 0 Z 2 Qi O z o L Q Q O 5 U i i 0 O — o U Q O 2 Q I i i
R 0 L Q U i I O — L Q U . L Q U o Q LU . — o L Q U 2 L Q U O 2 Q LU r Q LU . L Q U E L C U L
Q LU o O Q O LU o O o O o O
O Q UJ or
n C Qi Q O
Qi o Qi o O
A O o 5 L U 2 U J o 0 O Z O O O O O O D O O O a Z 0 LU
LU Q LL i Z u S 2 I< $ D o S
< c z o
0 o
O U U J o I C D M
< O
0 0 CM
i
O
2
LU
— 0)
< S°
1— id (o
0
BUF-01(25)

Page 48
S.B. NO. 473
o * < ♦ < « < z * < • : 5 . < * < a ♦ 5
2
o o o o) 0-0 o CO oom o co o m o o co
o O. o o o I co co m O O 04 o o OTOOL
or 0> 1: co 0 id N O. CD O. 04 o - 03 Q. —O.Qc CO
CO — co co m co co 03 -28 3
C O. CD -$ 3 C 03 co CO
O CO O. co m I 00 O
9 o’ 5 co T- co’ o' 04’ - —
—(O N co - s
<04
0 00
Z (N
o
u
—
st
Q n o ♦ < * < * < z * < * : s * < ,<.3
o2
o o 88 0+0 o co oom O 00 o in q o co
o O. o r co co in O O 04 o o o s o o m
o . co I in OO cd O. c ci . o C —O.Oc CO
g is c C N O — o O c o o > co c — o o m c C o c o 0 o 3 > t c c “ o o 0 0 m 0 — c — — o o o 00 n o Q
>o o’ i co' — co' o' g — —
— w 04 04 co —
S8
0^
0
Z
O
2>
u 9 U 2 Q C 0 Q 0 Q Q 0 a 0 Q 0 a 0 SS S
O
CD CM CO CM
O CM C 3 M CM o co O £ LO
00 Q Q Q Q Q
O 0 0) 0 0 0 0 3
or
C
O
O
0 UJ 0 UJ o
o R 0
> —
or 0 Q
UJ D
0 z 0 ar 0 Z 0 S 0 0 Q ( 0 Z Z LU 0
0 R F U Q O & J L z 2 C IL < ( U o Q J o A 0 a Q r O U 0 J Q O UJ . O 1 O — Q O UJ 0 o U — — J 2 o C U Q J . U o o O L 2 L J r O U Q J
o n o R 0 z o L Q U U Q J < UJ z 0 UJ
U
0
J 5 O
o A
— U
5
J Q
UJ UJ 0 LU o
n ar 2 O Q o or 0 UJ
o LU o o I
O u. 0
Z
LU
o
UJ
—
$ LU C 1
00
0
85 fo
44
5202
,5
yraunaJ
BUF-01(25)

Page 49
S.B. NO. 473
I***Z*0
OOO0ONOL
OIwO0w0
GNO-°—).
— (O — o
co ©I
- — 10
— to o
*I**Z*0
o o OOONOL
o 10 — O O — O —
o CM QO—O.N
(O — o
00 OI
3
E
O'
00
CM
BUF-01(25)

Page 50
S.B. NO. 473
3 , <
* < CD J Q. ***OHOO *<0* o
o
o
o
o'
o
o
1
C
Z
o
< Cl Q 000
() 0) 000
& Q. Q Q a. q.
n
o
I
a.
Q
n 0
<
2
<
a
0
O
Qi
a.
ID
ns
C
co
BUF-01 (25)

Page 51
S.B. NO. 473
< * : Q O Q **02 t CL 5 <000
COIO000 OIIOC O H O O O O o
COC0O ONCO1 o C) O O O O o
660 O © — o C © O. —OdCQQ Q
OONCcN C CO 00 O CD CM N o' o' o' o'
05 LOCI OL O. o o o o
O NON “ wQ!
N o’ N co N co' co' —
CM
< « * Q00
COIONOO
NGONOO
t CD 6 © O O
OONCcc
o O. I CN
o OwO
N o' — co
L LL LL LL _LL _ LL(LO)
LU LU LU LU LU LU LU LU LU 0 LU (
O 00Q 000 Q QQ<
CD
CM
O
CM
ID'
2
CO
□
C
CM CO
BUF-01(25)

Page 52
S.B. NO. 473
o m CD m * m m
D. C i S i n n M C in M CD C) C O o . D . 00 I C C C o D O O L S g C i o c s N n d M t '
o) cm'
CM
Q08
Z00
O ,
m CD CD do •
z
C ID M m O C CO M O. c m C o M ' i O n . © C I O o D M
% 8 o O ID 8 CD c o o o CM CM
>CM t co CD cm' 0 C 5
—
<CM
0OON
0.
2>
99
AL O O O O O o O O
82 U O O o O O O
Q
LU
s
< o 0 r Q C O < M i o X n 8 <
O O O o
Q O O O O o O O
O
0
O
C
0 c 0
Z
o Q
0 o
o'
Z 0
LU LU
O O
o
>
o — DC
Q S LU o o
D U • 0 2 C J 0 U O I 0 Z — < Qi C o L L — o L U C 0 Z < Di 0 0 U Q 0 I i 0 z 2 Qi O — < O 9 ( k 0 o 0 L Q U 0 z — < Di 0 0 2 O 2
0 o Q Q Z O o L 1 U > Q U 0 J i O 0 > U C o L J o o > Q< U Q o J . U Q > Q U J I i L D O U l o _ < z a i u Q o i 0 L R U L O Q U & < 0 Z L Q O U O 0 LU
— o UI Di 0 o LU o
0 — T 0 Q a i O u z o — O Z o § D L — U _ m < U 1 J U 5 D 0 Z o J O st 0 0 L U O Q U i O Z < D 0 Q o L 0 0 o — U m Q
UJ 0 o o
D — Ul ID
Q O Di CM
Qi O
CM
O i
o 2
LU (
s uO
CM co
0
BUF-01 (25)

0
z
O
<
oe
n
o
&
a.
n
<
2
<
C
□
O
m
Ql
10
04
i
r
ra
3
C
C
BUF-01 (25)

Page 54
S.B. NO. 473
85
fo
05
5202
,5
yraunaJ
BUF-01(25)

Page 55 S.B. NO 473
o = 4 m <: z 5 o , i < o
<X| m o CD
co o ID
Di c CM o C co O " < — o o cm" CM 00 0 C 0 O co ID C r O
in — CO CO
CM ID
> — CX1 in CO CM LQ
938
Z00
Qu.
<
F 8Q u O *
CM L8 8Q s C c O o o o o§ LO Y ID
C 0 D 0 ’ — N x in 5 CO 8 0 « 0 LO ^-OO co
m - 00 o co
CXI CM co in
cm" cm'CM cm" in
09
0N
C
z
o
2>
92 O 0 0 L Q U L o U L Q U L Q U L Q U L 0 U L Q U
Q uU 0 CO CO CO CD CO CO CO
n
O
CO
Qi
00 0 Q Q o
o- o 0 I C U O L C U O L C U D
Di
0
q
o LU
2 2
n CL Q. 2
o L — U 1 o Z q 2 o Qi o
LU Q LU i 2 o o D < i
O o Q Q o L 0 U )
> q 0 2 0 0 O O o Z 0 2 LU 0 0 0 Z I Q U 0 Z
0 o Q C o D CL . o o C 0 Q L i Q o D L > o Z U i i A L Q O a U . L — D L U U L o Q U — O o L Z 2 U z z < 0 S 2 Q L o 5 U i — L 0 S U o o L 0 2 S U D — < L o U i « 0 Z S Z Z 3 — C L C o < U L L
ct D 0 L Q U O o 0 L X — U L X — U U - Q O S LU i . Q L § Q U • S o z C q o S L
O O Q LU L2U Z
LU LU LU > — s o
LU Q q q q o
2 O LL d _i 0 GO LU
Z O o Q LU o o
LU
>
o
o 0
LU
— s EUIOS y
VID
TEGDUB
& NOITARTSINIMDA
LATNEMTRAPED
in CM
m
2
as
5 c LO <6 C
BUF-01 (25)

Page 56 S.B. NO 473
m
OS
DC I C D O O O. 2 CM i c n o P CD . O ID c c O o o
8 in 8 o) 8 o’ CD I O L D D . O. C c CO O o CM
o “8 c
—to
088
Z0N
Ou
<
Yu
89 0
2
D CL . I C D O O O C LO c N m o in C c c Q o o O.
<r in o CO s o O " in C in M O O . CM
O O
og O. co'
0N
W
Z
o
2>
92 0) 0 0 0
uU 0 ( m O ( 0 0
CD O in
o
CO
00 5 0 0
OT 0 0
Q 0 m
0
IB
g
O O
LU 0 Z
Q 0 o 0
0 2 2 0 Z o 1— o S S 0 2 0 Z 0 U g J 0 0 L Q o U
C 0 o — < D LB C 0 5 o L C O B L o L L Q Z< B B O 0 Z Q Z LU < D L O C B C L 0 o — O L 2 U L O Q B . o o — — < D L D o B C . > D U 0 Z O C J L C O B L C Q < 0 Q Z L
0 I 0 Q Z — L u U I L L 5 U U I O B L O B — O U • J U g & J
O 0 DC 0 o L O U 0 O LB d O L 0 U
3
0 u 2
Z LL LU O
— O o O
o O L Q B . i C n M
0) o
CM
i
o 2
LU Co
— $ IB CM 3 C (o
(O
0
BUF-01(25)

Page 57
S.B. NO 473
8
o m o
=
ID co CD CD
or C C O O C O. C C O D LO C C c C C O M M o D CM C C c c c M o D o d CO C 3 C CM D C 0 - D 0 C 5 M c - d a C co CD L O O .
CD cd cm' lD
006
2
Kz
CD
qS
m m o <0 05 CD CO §
co o> o CM O ID CD
O. co m 9 “ i - n C o C D M C C M M a co O a CM d . co C t c o o O O o CM . co C ID
CD 05
co' CO m"
0N
0
2
O
2>
92 0 0 0 0
0 0 0 0 2
uU m
O
n CM CO ID
O O CM
DC
00 0 0 CO 0 U u
O 0 0 0 0 0
0 m
LU
O
Z<
Z
LU
o
—
0 o
LL
o
o
r o
o Z
LU LU LL
0 2 s
Z o CL
IU Q. o
> — 0 0
LU z LU 2
R 0 O O a 0 Z O 2 0 Z 2 ( ( o 0 0 z
0 o n R o L Q U 0 L O L 0 > C 0 u U I O Q U . a Z 0 L D Q Q < U Q > 0 L — 0 0 5 U < o L Q R U Z X L U D < S U C l — o L < Q U O Q L Z < Q Q U . U O CL l 0 0 — 0 o < L C O U L O 0 Z S 0 Q z S U C O L l m L O U
Z LU 0 0 Q >
A o C C — L L O C o Q L . o o o z LU z Q o Q Q. U Q l < s O I 0 — 0 Q U
• < o m LU
0 O Q O
0
ID
CM
O
CM
CO
o 2
LU 05
— A io 10 cd CO O. □ C CO
0
BUF-01(25)

Page 58
S.B. NO. 473
0 * D O
OOOOOIO O
O
-f c
O
o o
O
— C
0
M
0co 0
CM
0
o
o
cd
CM CO CO — CO CO ID o
CO — r I — O
O. L 0 O
— cm’ co’ cm’
ID
♦ < * t CD * D O
O(O0O*Ot0 o
OOOOO00 P
—NeENeOQ od
C) (O x- CO C) IO O
- x- N - O
CM LQ CO Q
co cm' co' r
LO
C
z
o
2>
<
92 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 0 000
a uU C — < H< I<- H< H< H< H< 0 < 0 < 0 < 0 <
n
o
m
n
0Q 0 W
a O 0
< n.
2
<
R
O
O
m
Q.
H
Z
HI
LU
0 0
Z
C
O
O Q
o
O
LU
Q
0
IU
T
o
Q
<
IO
2
CO
5
CM C
CM CM (0
BUF-01(25)

Page 59
S.B. NO. 473
in
CXI
o
N
m
2
(O
□
c
co
BUF-01 (25)

Page 60 S.B. NO. 473
o t m CD ( o
LO O co
05 O 05 C
n 0 C cd 5 O ' CM 0 c P o 0► —c c o o c 0 CM o 5 ' C 0 c 0 o O 5 ' CD C o 5 D IO o o - & co t w o 0 0 5 5 CM 05
CM CM CM
006 co CM
Z0N
Ou
<
&u m 0 m
89
2
Q Q<
2 c s o
C o c
- C c
O
M o f
q
' I c D o'
C
C s M
O o c
c c 0 C
o
M o o 5 '
§
q o C o M
O m
c O c
0
o o
.
. '
o O in
ID
C
c 0 -
N O
5 o I C C D M O
C
o o o
2 co
C w D C C O O
CM s
— — t O, ID c c o o CM CM C C M M
< CM
OO
0N
0
z
O
2>
92 O' Q Q C 0 0 W 0 0 0 Q
0 0 0 0 0 0 0
g5 co co
Ul
o
O' < s CM CM C O M
Q 0 i 0 C u D n C 0 0 M 0 C 0 M C 0 0 M X
O
Di
C O
— 1—
Z o
LU 0
Di
C LU
0 Q < o Z 0 Z
o UI Ul < O
O 0 z o
O
<
Q z <
Q _
W
1
0
O
LU o
z
a
Q D Di Di 0
o 0 0
LL O z O Z Ul
2 o Q
E
0 7 0 Z L 2 U 0 2 Z LU — z 0 0 0 0 Z < 0 z 0'
0 R o U Q O l . < C > L — < D L O Q i U S U 0 I I L 0 0 U —< A L Q o U A 0 Ul U 0 U 2 I I L O Q U . U Q O 1 . 0 Z L Q O U < D L n O U i U D 0 Z o O 0 l i < D L O Q U i . O O • D 0 — i 0 X
n LU Z Q X LU 0 < z Z o o Q
3 0 Di LU o s
LU Q L Q r U i o 0 D L — < U i D 0 O Z s L O u L U L . 5 < 0 Ul 0 L — U O m
O 0 o o
Di ID
CM
O
CM
ID'
o 2
Ul CO
s UUS 05 C C M O ID 3 c co
0
BUF-01(25)

LO
C
i
2
CD
3
C
(
BUF-01 (25)

Page 62 S.B. NO. 473
85
fo
85
5202
,5
yraunaJ
BUF-01(25)

Page 63
S.B. NO. ^73
1 PART III. PROGRAM APPROPRIATION PROVISIONS
2 HEALTH
3 SECTION 4. Provided that the general fund appropriations
4 for Maui Health System, a KFH LLC (HTH214), for fiscal
5 biennium 2025-2027 shall be disbursed by the Hawaii health
6 systems corporation to the Maui Health System, a Kaiser
7 Foundation Hospitals LLC, for its operating subsidies in the
8 respective fiscal years; provided further that the Maui Health
9 System has satisfied all of the standards and conditions of
10 section 323F-58, Hawaii Revised Statutes.
11 FORMAL EDUCATION
12 SECTION 5. Provided that out of the general fund
13 appropriations for charter schools commission and administration
14 (EDN612) for fiscal biennium 2025-2027, the charter schools
15 commission shall determine the sums required for teacher
16 differentials for hard-to-staff and Hawaiian immersion teachers
17 for each fiscal year and shall disburse the respective amounts
18 to the impacted schools.
19 PUBLIC SAFETY
20 SECTION 6. Provided that of the general fund appropriation
21 for the Hawaii emergency management agency (DEF118), the sum of
22 $5,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal
23 year 2025-2026 and the sum of $5,000,000 or so much thereof as
24 may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 shall be expended for
25 relief from major disasters pursuant to section 127A-16, Hawaii
BUF-01(25)

Page 64 S.B. NO. 473
1 Revised Statutes; provided further that any funds not expended
2 for this purpose shall lapse to the general fund.
3 INDIVIDUAL RIGHTS
4 SECTION 7. Provided that of the general fund appropriation
5 for the office of the public defender (BUF151), the sum of
6 $126,364 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal
7 year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be
8 necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 shall be transferred to the
9 judiciary for the administration and operation of the community
10 outreach court project.
11 SECTION 8. Provided that of the general fund appropriation
12 for the office of the public defender (BUF151), the sum of
13 $165,404 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal
14 year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be
15 necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 shall be transferred to the
16 office of the prosecuting attorney of the city and county of
17 Honolulu for the operation of the community outreach court
18 project.
19 GOVERNMENT-WIDE SUPPORT
20 SECTION 9. Provided that of the general fund appropriation
21 for the office of the governor (GOV100), the sum of $10,000 or
22 so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026
23 and the sum of $10,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary
24 for fiscal year 2026-2027 shall be used for the governor's
25 "contingent fund" pursuant to section 37-71 (f), Hawaii Revised
BUF-01(25)

Page 65 S.B. NO. A73
1 Statutes; and provided further that such funds may be
2 transferred to other programs and agencies and allotted, with
3 the approval of the governor, to meet contingencies as they
4 arise.
5 SECTION 10. Provided that of the general fund
6 appropriation for vacation payout - statewide (BUF103), the sum
7 of $9,700,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal
8 year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be
9 necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 shall be expended for the
10 purposes of reimbursing all executive departments and agencies
11 for vacation payouts for general funded employees who have left
12 the employ of the executive branch; provided further that any
13 unexpended funds shall lapse to the general fund at the end of
14 the respective fiscal year for which the appropriation was made.
15 SECTION 11. Provided that of the general fund
16 appropriations for debt service payments (BUF721-BUF728) for
17 fiscal biennium 2025-2027, balances that are unrequired for debt
18 service payments may be used to pay for expenses related to
19 section 39-14, Hawaii Revised Statutes, and for costs of bond
20 issuance, or may be transferred to retirement benefits payments
21 (BUF741-BUF748) and health premium payments (BUF761-BUF768);
22 provided further that the funds shall not be expended for any
23 other purpose; and provided further that any unexpended funds
24 shall lapse to the general fund at the end of the respective
25 fiscal year for which the appropriation was made.
BUF-01 (25)

Page 66 S.B. NO. 473
1 SECTION 12. Provided that of the general fund
2 appropriations for retirement benefits payments (BUF741-BUF748)
3 for fiscal biennium 2025-2027, balances that are unrequired may
4 be transferred only to debt service payments (BUF721-BUF728) and
5 health premium payments (BUF7 61-BUF7 68); provided further that
6 the funds shall not be expended for any other purpose; and
7 provided further that any unexpended funds shall lapse to the
8 general fund at the end of the respective fiscal year for which
9 the appropriation was made.
10 SECTION 13. Provided that of the general fund
11 appropriations for health premium payments (BUF761-BUF768) for
12 fiscal biennium 2025-2027, balances that are unrequired may be
13 transferred only to debt service payments (BUF721-BUF728) and
14 retirement benefits payments (BUF741-BUF748); provided further
15 that the funds shall not be expended for any other purpose; and
16 provided further that any unexpended funds shall lapse- to the
17 general fund at the end of the respective fiscal year for which
18 the appropriation was made.
19 PART IV. CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS
20 SECTION 14. CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS AUTHORIZED. The
21 sums of money appropriated or authorized in part II of this Act
22 for capital improvements shall be expended for the projects
23 listed below. Accounting of the appropriations by the
24 department of accounting and general services shall be based on
25 the projects as such projects are listed in this section.
BUF-01(25)

Page 67
S.B. NO. 473
1 Several related or similar projects may be combined into a
2 single project if such combination is advantageous or convenient
3 for implementation; and provided further that the total cost of
4 the projects thus combined shall not exceed the total of the sum
5 specified for the projects separately. (The amount after each
6 cost element and the total funding for each project listed in
7 this part are in thousands of dollars.)
BUF-01 (25)

Page 68
S.B. NO. 473
DOO
OOO
000 o
co 111 LU LU LU
m tn co CO
o
LU
-
o
Q
m m
n m
z
LU
E
o
LU o
>
o
&
a
s
— 0
< O z
— LU Q
5
o
0. o
or
<
CL
o
P009
<
202D
uO3
CL
<
o
o
z
<
<
R
O
o
& LLI
CL Ct
o
o
CM
52/50/10
BUE-01(25)

Page 69
S.B. NO. 473
O
CM
do o
CD O
CD O
f in
0) CQ. (
0< O
<
O
<
0
<
2
O
—
0
3
O
o <
Z o
53
• O
o
o
s
BUF-01 (25)

Page 70
S.B. NO. 473
o o o
ar or Q
(< (< <(
0 0
2 z z
O Q
Z
D
D
x
<
o
() -
Z Q
53
Q0O a O
o
o
co
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01 (25)

Page 71
S.B. NO. 473
o 0000
N
0 co Q000
(D 0 UIWLL
< < mmmm
O.
Q
0
0
Z
Q
Z
D
IL
□ o QOOL
2
BUF-01(25)

Page 72
S.B. NO. 473
O0 0000
0000
LU LU HJ LU
CO CO CO CO co
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01 (25)

Page 73
S.B. NO. 473
o 000 o
O 000 O
0 000 Q
LU LU IU LU 2
m co m co
Q
2
0 O
2 z
z o Z 2 Q 2 o Z 0
U.
_I
$
o
QQ0L
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01 (25)

Page 74
S.B. NO. 473
00
10 10
Q Q O
LU LU LU
CD CD CD
10
Q
LU
CD
C
C C O D S O
Q
O O o
CD CD
(
3
IO
N
ID
BUF-01(25)

Page 75
S.B. NO. 473
O O O O O
o o O o
O o O o
O o O o
o'o' o'o'
CXI CXI ID ID
o o o o o
o 8 8 o o O ID o O ID Q o o O o o o o o o o o o o o o o o
• - — — o'o' 06
CXI C ID ID
2
LO
O
ID
O
BUF-01 (25)

Page 76
S.B. NO. 473
O
O
>
UI
co
Q
LU
m
O
Q
L
X
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01 (25)

Page 77 S.B. NO. 473
u2 uz
v- 10 CD
OM CM
EE
0
2
O _I
„2s
Q
652 o
Q O
228 Q o
LU
00 Q
g
T o
x
8
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01 (25)

Page 78
S.B. NO. 473
U. Z LUZ uZ
LO m
LUZ
(ONLO
m in
2
A
—
O > m
o o m
O Q Q
0 0 2
2
Q
—Q—
6b9
5Z
□ o 00
—
cr Q
o O
Q Q.
Q Q.
<
O m
O
O 1
o
o O
o in
BUF-01(25)

Page 79 S.B. NO. 473
UZ LU Z
O O o
“t t o
t
o t r
LU 2
D.D
EE
in
(O O
2
Q Q
0
2
A
o
Q00
Q
O
LU
D
T
003
o
8 o
to cd
BUF-01 (25)

Page 80
S.B. NO. 473
CQ x
OIO(ONO
OSNNO
UUOEO
N co to
<
co
LU
Q
DO
(
—
2
UJ
5
UJ
>
o
D
Q
2
2
o
<
8
o
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01(25)

Page 81 S.B. NO. 473
COZ0 mze
000-—ON
CD CD
0.0
8 8
Z0
AZ0
co co co co st MT t
CM CM
EEE CCm
C — — —
o
L
o
Z
& R
n
2
t
CM
s LO
L
>
o
&
D.
s
(
— z Z
3 o o Q
LU Z
“5 0 D
Q. o •
R o
< a O
o 0 <
<
Zo
4 z
— s 00
Q.
<
O
O
z
<
s
<
&
0
o
K
Q
o
P
cd
BUF-01(25)

Page 82 S.B. NO. 473
m Z Q AZ0
Is
m Z Q OZ0
0000- 0000
Z22
QQ.Q
—FF
O)
n
o
co
Q C
o <
cn X
or
D
_J
X
$
o
O
ID
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01 (25)

Page 83
S.B. NO. 475
20 mo z Q
00003 000)
AZ0
000)
222
CCQ CCC
———
co
s
(
2
ao 0O
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01(25)

Page 84 S.B. NO. 473
CZ0 m
000-OH5 o o
o o
t t
No
20
00003
Nci
LO
CD
CO
Z
Q
CM
( O
2 Z
Q
2
QO
Q.
o
co
Q
<
X
5
<
A
S
<
5
D
$
Q20
o o
o o
cd o
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01(25)

41
Page 85 S.B. NO
co 20 uz LLI Z
CO CO C
AZ0 U. Z
co co co
CM
0
2
Q
Z
3
_I
<
—
o
□ □
2
LO
9
10
CM
BUF-01 (25)

Page 86 413
S.B. NO.
LU LU LU Z
co Kor
HF
o
LU
-
o
Q
a
Z
LU
2 Q
CD
ill
>
O
m
a
2
— 0
< Z
u
LU Z Q
“5 oZ
2
n. o U-
R
< a
O
<
QO
a
<
O
Q
z
<
s
<
&
0
o
&
Q.
O
LU
CD
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01(25)

Page 87
S.B. NO. 173
m z LU Z LU Z
006 O O O O
O O O O O O O
t v st OONc
— 1O Lo o'
O C
coz u2
o o o
o o o
000
t v f
CQ CQ
ID
Z
or
s 8
o
>
09
2 z CO
3 — LU
-JO
0)
ID
N
ID
o
o
CO
C N C
BUF-01 (25)

Page 88 S.B. NO. 173
MUZ m lu z
O o o 0000000
O o o OWO000C
L (DO v0c
tn — f — co r cm' 0
caiuz m lu z
Z Z Z zzz
ce ce or C—CCH
LO
O.
mE
L
0
2 Z
O
—
CO
C
O
o<
ZQ
53
CM
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01(25)

Page 89 S.B. NO. 473
UZ cuZ muz
C
muz
LU 2
OSNO0t0
Ow(ONC0
OTOo9cs
— c co u f CD CO"
— ID * CD O.
sr co
Z72
QD C0.0 CCC
——H HRH
ID
0.
ID
2
Q
Q
O. O)
O. O.
o O
X X
LL
0
3
LU
<
1-
(
(
2
Z s
2
J
§
X
(
ID
X 9
ID
O o
Q o
co
co
BUF-01(25)

S.B. NO. 413
Page 90
muz muzo
UJ CD LU 2 OUzo
0000 O ID 00 ID — st ©
o m o m ONLOIOOC
CD O) O CM OONNOCP
o f
2 2277
Cd Q QC0
————
ID
05
ID
2
01
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01 (25)

Page 91 S.B. NO. 473
QUZ u z
-——O0
O o o o
• (O C O.
OUZ LZ
OO000C0 — — O CM
ONOL000 O O O
O(O0001t CO CM CO
zz
Q Q. Q CD
——F
0
Z z
o Q
Z
0 •
• LL
a _I
9 $
o
o —
z
s
00
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01(25)

Page 92 173
S.B. NO
OZ OZ U
CO CM CO — co co
co co o N -- m
xr Q s 0.1
o' m" 1 1 L o)
CO CM co C
in
CM
CO CM co
COCOO
Os
o' 1 in
C CM
co
o
L
“5
o
n
n
z
LU
2
LU
>
O
&
n
2
O
4 O Z
LU Q
- Z
D
n o
R
<
n
O O
—
<
H
QIU
CL
<
O
Q
Z
<
s
<
5
Q
O
o
ct
CL
o
u
LU CM
0
BUF-01 (25)

Page 93 S.B. NO TO
o
O O
000
O o o
C co o
— ci
O
000
o NC o O O S t — W co O co
— oi
L
co
C
Q
0
— Q — —
96529
99
2020 20
u
0.Q
C
UJ
O
5
•
O
0
LU
Q
n
LU ID
O
in
O
o
in co
BUF-01(25)

Page 94 S.B. NO. 473
o
O. O
O. O
-f 1
O
--—O
0. Q O. o
O. O O o
N co r t
or a:
Z Z
Q
LU
0 (
2
Q
Z
22
(
-&s $
659 O
IU o
X I-
0Z W
Q.
LU Q00L
o
o)
IU
>
Q
LU
0
IU
Q
LU
Q
QQ001
O
o
cd
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01(25)

Page 95 413
S.B. NO.
O
O
—oO
O. o
sr •
N N
(
2
□
Z 2
O
O
z%
00
0Z
mo
Q0
O
O
CO
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01(25)

Page 96
S.B. NO. 473
o o
o
O Q O O
00C
NNUo
vr t
O
O O O Q
L L O O
NOtc
ID ID
T
I
O
0s)
0 (
z
□ OU QOL
ID
9
ID
o
o
o
BUF-01 (25)

Page 97 S.B. NO. H73
o o
00—0 ---O
o C o o O. o
©twO CD O
o N — in co"
—
o o
000 O) --O
LO co o co O o
NNC C CD O
— ID CO"
x
tn
I
o
L
O C
T
I —
x
n
0 0 0
2 Z
Q z Q
O O Z
D
LL
2020
uo3
OULU 0.QOI1I QOOL
—
2
o o §
o o o
co
BUF-01(25)

Page 98
S.B. NO. 473
O o o o
L LO o o o
t •
t io in
N N to
C0 C
(( 0
< < <
§
C
L)
C
O 0
Z z
0
z
D
QO
ID
C
in
o o
O o
oi co
BUF-01 (25)

Page 99 S.B. NO. 473
•
o
tu
“3
o
n.
2
L
2
u
>
O
E
n
2
—
<
O
— L
n o
< R
a
O
<
—
QOL
n.
<
O
Q
z
<
s
<
R
O
o
R
n
-)1(2A
52/50/10
o
ill
0
BUF-01 (25)

Page 100 S.B. NO. 173
o o on
O O
o o
o O
t ID
coo
(
O LULU
< 00
O
to
C
O
Z
□
Z
D
LL
QO Q00L
in
N
ID
o O
o O
ci CO
BUF-01(25)

S.B. NO. 473
Page 101
00 00 O
—00—O
O O o
OO Q
to f o'
— CM
OO
O O Q O
o o o o
O O o o
to CD CO' co"
LU
Q
5
LU
s
QQ0U
0
2
UJ
S
Q
O
uj
>
UJ
Q
s
O
S
UJ
_i
$ Lo
9
t
o
o
t
BUF-01(25)

Page 102 S.B. NO. 473
t
©
>
C
o
ui
-
o
n
a
Z
UJ
2
UJ
>
O
&
n
2
O
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01 (25)

Page 103
S.B. NO. 473
o o o o
2
o
LU
O
o
0
in
0
2
no
(
0
BUF-01(25)

Page 104 S.B. NO. 473
O
2 22
Q 00
LU LULU
O
o
Q
LU
co O)
LU
Q 0
Z
QOL QO
Q
O
5
D
0
Q.
2
D
O o
O o
L CD
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01(25)

Page 105 S.B. NO. 413
O
O O
co m N o
COOO
OLO
— m
2
Q Q
in LU
o
o
2
Q
ILI
CD CD
2 Z
Q a
2 2
D
LL LL
—I
s 2
o 9
OOL
-)1(2A
52/50/10
o o
o o
co o
BUF-01(25)

Page 106 S.B. NO. 173
o o
O
P ID CO O
ONLO
v N O
ID o
2
Q
LU
O
O
2
LU
( LU LU
Q
— u < — •
rOl233
OR SRSu
0 o
LU
ECA0z Q Z
RHpgt 3 Q
o LU 2 Z
co" _1
LU CO S
OSoug2 E O
Q
LLP280 0
w
Z
o
D
o
UU
w52=5o QOL
S=uuo0 CO
Q Q
O
OC =-z=utdWg0g
U200-2
LU LU
SS%50s •
o 2 Ue -ULO o
UU
(JO
oS2
C
ZOE500
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01(25)

Page 107
S.B. NO. 47b
o o o
z
Q
LU
C CO
2
GO CO
0
z
o
2
D
LL
„*
Q99
X 52
<
o □ o Q O
o
o
X
O
0
LU
Q
Q
5
2
5
o
z
o
x
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01(25)

Page 108 S.B. NO. 473
o o
O O
0 W IL
0 0 LU
< < Q
Q LU
IU 0
W
T
0
z
-
)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01(25)

Page 109 S.B. NO. 473
O
O
O O O o
o o o o
t 00
N N in
o
O
X
o
X
LU
o2
CD
LU
z892 -0
O
-z5ud Z
u@0u%20
Q
AV.—egas
QWZ.Zu
C EEeRFE
X —ulgOs
C =2% or Q
C OQOE0—
5 Z 0 O IU ) LU • = u Y s 2 o m Z o D o
Q S QOL
Q — 0
< LU O0Ou
o 0) Gozuos
0
CD X
2
Q0E—
2&300 Q -0)
x 22 — 2—- 0n O% m
OuKuzO t 9
o o
o o
o o
C C
BUF-01(25)

Page 110 S.B. NO. 41
LO LO o
X
o
D
CM
X
o
LO c c o o
0
D Z
X
Q
< Z
o D
LU O u
N
z
n
IU
Q
O
□ o DO
Q
o
0 UI
>
o
IU
o Z
UI
E Q
0 g
Q.
LU
ci
CM
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01(25)

Page 111 S.B. NO. 473
O
5
O 3
X X
o o
D
o
D
CT)
3 X
<
) OZ 0
z
o Q Q
Z
D
659
228
00
in
C
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01(25)

Page 112 S.B. NO. 473
O
C O
1
o
D
o
o
O.
L
O
D
CO
LO
0
Z
Q
Poox
202
IO
s
co
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01(25)

Page 113 S.B. NO. 473
o o
co
CO
oo
0
(
0
2
Q
Z
D
969
20
u
ci
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01 (25)

ms
Page 114
S.B. NO.
0z o o
OZ O
O O O o O o
LOOIO O o
CD ID CD ID O o
NN tt
or ct
zz
CD O
CD CD
s S
0
2
CD
O
QO
LU
t
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01(25)

Page 115 S.B. NO. 173
o O
0
<
0 0
Z 2
Q
Z
D
LL
ZES
9000
2020
□ moo
Q00L QOOL
-)1(2A
52/50/10
o
o
CM
BUF-01(25)

Page 116
S.B. NO. 473
o o
o
2 z
o
a
—OsE
0be9
0ZD
3
QOL
o
P
s
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01 (25)

Page 117
S.B. NO. 473
O o o
—C in
O
• CO LQ
Q Q
0 0) (
Q. Q <
0
•OL 0.
t CO
BUF-01 (25)

Page 118 S.B. NO. 423
o o
io
3
w ui
0
<
<0
Q
S
Z
0 0
2 2 2
QOL
OL
O o
o O
co d
BUF-01(25)

Page 119
S.B. NO. 473
00
00
co co
LL LL
LU LU
00
LL
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01 (25)

Page 120
S.B. NO. 413
00
0 < 0 < L a U
C co
CM CM
Q Q
O O
(
2
O
9659
202
UO
QOU
ID
N
ID
O
o
o
o
BUF-01 (25)

Page 121 S.B. NO 413
O
O O
O o OY00-O
88 O ID 0 p 0 O 00
CM CM
CO
()
O
<
LO
O
o
—
Q
o
O
Z
0
2
0
m
o
o
co
BUF-01 (25)

Page 122 S.B. NO. 173
0 m
LOO0O
NNOLO
—— t
O
UJ LU
0 0 (
Z Z Z
Q
Q
Z
Z
• D
L
—sH
Qobe2 C9
a Z 2 C H <288 2 •u 0)
u
Q. Q Q 001
LO
O
L
o
o O
ow Oo
BUF-01(25)

473
Page 123
S.B. NO.
O
O
0 O
< <
C
CM
0
0
<
CM
O
ID
CN
O 8
O
co o)
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01(25)

Page 124 S.B. NO. 413
O o
O
0-0-O
O 05 O
O
— N
0
0
<
CJ
CM
W
(
<
0
Z
Z
O
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01 (25)

S.B. NO. 4173
Page 125
CO
ID
C)
<
0
Z
Q09L
o
o
CM
-)1(2A
52/50/10
BUF-01 (25)

Page 126 S.B. NO. 473
1 PART V. CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM PROVISIONS
2 SECTION 15. Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, the
3 appropriations under Act 164, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023,
4 section 7, as amended and renumbered by Act 230, Session Laws of
5 Hawaii 2024, section 7, in the amounts indicated or balances
6 thereof, unallotted, allotted, unencumbered, or encumbered and
7 unrequired, are hereby lapsed:
8 "Item No. Amount (MOF)
9
10 G-6 $ 500,000 C
11 G-9.3 671,000 C
12 G-14.3 660,000 C
13 G-15.3 1,000,000 C
14 G-24 2,500,000 C
15 G-25.1 350,000 C
16 G-36 21,000 C
17 G-46 6,000,000 C
18 G-52 2,500,000 C
19 G-53.2 100,000 c
20 G-54.1 2,000,000 C
21 G-61.1 1,000,000 c
22 G-64 130,000 C
23 G-70.1 500,000 C
24 G-74 6,000,000 C
25 G-78.2 4,000,000 C
26 G-79.2 150,000 C
27 G-86.1 1,000,000 C
28 G-92.1 650,000 C
29 G-98 200,000 C
30 G-99.2 1,320,000 C
31 G-111.2 650,000 C
32 G-112 3,000,0.00 C
33 G-112.1 200,000 C
34 G-113 1,500,000 C
35 G-113.2 1,680,000 C
36 G-113.3 1,000,000 C
37 G-119 100,000 C"
BUF-01(25)

Page 127 S.B. NO. +77
1 SECTION 16. Provided that the general fund and general
2 obligation bond fund appropriations for Maui Health System, a
3 KFH LLC (HTH214), for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 shall be
4 disbursed by the Hawaii health systems corporation to the Maui
5 Health System, a Kaiser Foundation Hospitals LLC, for its
6 capital subsidies in the respective fiscal years; provided
7 further that the Maui Health System has satisfied all of the
8 standards and conditions of section 323F-58, Hawaii Revised
9 Statutes.
10 PART VI. ISSUANCE OF BONDS
11 SECTION 17. AIRPORT REVENUE BONDS. The department of
12 transportation is authorized to issue airport revenue bonds for
13 airport capital improvement program projects authorized in
14 part II and listed in part IV of this Act and designated to be
15 financed by revenue bond funds or by general obligation bond
16 funds with debt service cost to be paid from special funds, in
17 such principal amount as shall be required to yield the amounts
18 appropriated for such capital improvement program projects, and,
19 if so determined by the department and approved by the governor,
20 any additional principal amount as may be necessary by the
21 department to pay interest on such airport revenue bonds during
22 the estimated period of construction of the capital improvement
23 program project for which such airport revenue bonds are issued,
24 to establish, maintain, or increase reserves for the airport
25 revenue bonds and to pay the expenses of issuance of such bonds.
BUF-01(25)

S.B. NO. 473
Page 128
1 The airport revenue bonds shall be issued pursuant to the
2 provisions of part III of chapter 39, Hawaii Revised Statutes,
3 as the same may be amended from time to time. The principal of
4 and interest on airport revenue bonds, to the extent not paid
5 from the proceeds of such bonds, shall be payable solely from
6 and secured solely by the revenues from airports and related
7 facilities under the ownership of the State or operated and
8 managed by the department and the aviation fuel taxes levied and
9 paid pursuant to sections 243-4(a) (2) and 248-8, Hawaii Revised
10 Statutes, or such parts of either thereof as the department may
11 determine, including rents, landing fees, and other fees or
12 charges presently or hereafter derived from or arising through
13 the ownership, operation, and management of airports and related
14 facilities and the furnishing and supplying of the services
15 thereof, and passenger facility charges pursuant to
16 section 261-55, Hawaii Revised Statutes, as amended, and as
17 determined by the department. The expenses of the issuance of
18 such airport revenue bonds shall, to the extent not paid from
19 the proceeds of such bonds, be paid from the airport revenue
20 fund and passenger facility charge special fund as determined by
21 the department.
22 The governor, in the governor's discretion, is authorized
23 to use the airport revenue fund and passenger facility charge
24 special fund to finance those projects authorized in part II and
BUF-01(25)

Page 129 S.B. NO. 419
1 listed in part IV of this Act where the method of financing is
2 designated to be by airport revenue bond funds.
3 SECTION 18. RENTAL MOTOR VEHICLE CUSTOMER FACILITY REVENUE
4 BONDS. The department of transportation is authorized to issue
5 rental motor vehicle customer facility revenue bonds for airport
6 capital improvement program projects relating to consolidated
7 rental car facilities authorized in part II and listed in
8 part IV of this Act and designated to be financed by revenue
9 bond funds with debt service cost to be paid from rental motor
10 vehicle customer facility charge special funds, as authorized by
11 section 261-5.6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, in such principal
12 amount as shall be required to yield the amounts appropriated
13 for such capital improvement program projects, and, if so
14 determined by the department and approved by the governor, any
15 additional principal amount as may be necessary by the
16 department to pay interest on the rental motor vehicle customer
17 facility revenue bonds during the estimated period of
18 construction of the capital improvement program project for
19 which the rental motor vehicle customer facility revenue bonds
20 are issued, to establish, maintain, or increase reserves for the
21 rental motor vehicle customer facility revenue bonds and to pay
22 the expenses of issuance of the bonds. The rental motor vehicle
23 customer facility revenue bonds shall be issued pursuant to the
24 provisions of part III of chapter 39, Hawaii Revised Statutes,
25 as the same may be amended from time to time. The principal of
BUF-01(25)

Page 130 S.B. NO. 473
1 and interest on rental motor vehicle customer facility revenue
2 bonds, to the extent not paid from the proceeds of such bonds,
3 shall be payable solely from and secured solely by the revenues
4 from the rental motor vehicle surcharge tax and the rental motor
5 vehicle customer facility charge special fund pursuant to
6 section 261-5.6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, as amended, and as
7 determined by the department. The expenses of the issuance of
8 such rental motor vehicle customer facility revenue bonds, to
9 the extent not paid from the proceeds of such bonds shall be
10 paid from the rental motor vehicle customer facility charge
11 special fund as determined by the department; provided that the
12 rental motor vehicle customer facility charge in
13 section 261-7 (h), Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall not be amended
14 to supplement any additional or unforeseen costs related to the
15 issuance or debt service of the rental motor vehicle customer
16 facility revenue bonds that are authorized, appropriated, and
17 issued under this section.
18 The governor, in the governor's discretion, is authorized
19 to use the rental motor vehicle customer facility charge special
20 fund to finance those projects authorized in part 11 and listed
21 in part IV of this Act where the method of financing is
22 designated to be by rental motor vehicle customer facility
23 revenue bond funds.
24 SECTION 19. HARBOR REVENUE BONDS. The department of
25 transportation is authorized to issue harbor revenue bonds for
BUF-01(25)

Page 131 S.B. NO. 473
1 harbor capital improvement program project's authorized in
2 part II and listed in part IV of this Act and designated to be
3 financed by revenue bond funds or by general obligation bond
4 funds with debt service cost to be paid from special funds, in
5 such principal amount as shall be required to yield the amounts
6 appropriated for such capital improvement program projects, and,
7 if so determined by the department and approved by the governor,
8 such additional amounts as may be deemed necessary by the
9 department to pay interest on such revenue bonds during the
10 estimated construction period of the capital improvement project
11 for which such harbor revenue bonds are issued to establish,
12 maintain, or increase reserves for the harbor revenue bonds or
13 harbor revenue bonds heretofore authorized (whether authorized
14 and issued or authorized and still unissued), and to pay the
15 expenses of issuance of such bonds. The aforementioned harbor
16 revenue bonds shall be issued pursuant to the provisions of
17 part III of chapter 39, Hawaii Revised Statutes, as the same may
18 be amended from time to time. The principal of and interest on
19 harbor revenue bonds, to the extent not paid from the proceeds
20 of such bonds, shall be payable solely from and secured solely
21 by the revenues derived from harbors and related facilities
22 under the ownership of the State or operated and managed by the
23 department, including rents, mooring, wharfage, dockage,
24 pilotage fees, and other fees or charges presently or hereafter
25 derived from or arising through the ownership, operation, and
BUF-01(25)

Page 132 S.B. NO. 473
1 management of harbor and related facilities and the furnishing
2 and supplying of the services thereof. The expenses of the
3 issuance of such harbor revenue bonds shall, to the extent not
4 paid from the proceeds of such bonds, be paid from the harbor
5 special fund.
6 The governor, in the governor's discretion, is authorized
7 to use the harbor revenue fund to finance those projects
8 authorized in part 11 and listed in part IV of this Act where
9 the method of financing is designated to be by harbor revenue
10 bond funds.
11 SECTION 20. HIGHWAY REVENUE BONDS. The department of
12 transportation is authorized to issue highway revenue bonds for
13 highway capital improvement program projects authorized in
14 part II and listed in part IV of this Act and designated to be
15 financed by revenue bond funds or by general obligation bond
16 funds with the debt service cost to be paid from special funds,
17 in such principal amount as shall be required to yield the
18 amounts appropriated for such capital improvement projects, and,
19 if so determined by the department and approved by the governor,
20 such additional principal amount as may be deemed necessary by
21 the department to pay interest on such highway revenue bonds
22 during the estimated period of construction of the capital
23 improvement project for which such highway revenue bonds are
24 issued, to establish, maintain, or increase reserves for such
25 highway revenue bonds or highway revenue bonds heretofore
BUF-01 (25)

Page 133 S.B. NO. 473
1 authorized (whether authorized and issued or authorized and
2 still unissued), and to pay all or any part of the expenses
3 related to the issuance of such highway revenue bonds. The
4 aforementioned highway revenue bonds shall be issued pursuant to
5 the provisions of part III of chapter 39, Hawaii Revised
6 Statutes, as the same may be amended from time to time. The
7 principal of and interest on such highway revenue bonds, to the
8 extent not paid from the proceeds of such highway revenue bonds,
9 shall be payable from and secured by the revenues derived from
10 highways and related facilities under the ownership of the State
11 or operated and managed by the department, from the highway fuel
12 taxes, vehicle weight taxes, and vehicle registration fees,
13 levied and paid pursuant to sections 243-4, 248-8, 249-31, and
14 249-33, Hawaii Revised Statutes, and federal moneys received by
15 the State or any department thereof which are available to pay
16 principal of and/or interest on indebtedness of the State, or
17 such part of any thereof as the department may determine, and
18 other user taxes, fees or charges currently or hereafter derived
19 from or arising through the ownership, operation, and management
20 of highways and related facilities and the furnishing and
21 supplying of the services thereof. The expenses related to the
22 issuance of such highway revenue bonds, to the extent not paid
23 from the proceeds of such bonds, shall be paid from the state
24 highway fund.
BUF-01(25)

Page 134 S.B. NO. 4 73
1 The governor, in the governor's discretion, is authorized
2 to use the state highway fund to finance those projects
3 authorized in part 11 and listed in part IV of this Act where
4 the method of financing is designated to be by highway revenue
5 bond funds.
6 PART VII. SPECIAL PROVISIONS
7 SECTION 21. GOVERNOR'S DISCRETIONARY POWERS. Any law or
8 provision to the contrary notwithstanding, the governor may
9 replace general obligation bond funds appropriated for capital
10 improvement projects with general obligation reimbursable bond
11 funds, when the expenditure of such general obligation
12 reimbursable bond funds is deemed appropriate for the project.
13 SECTION 22. All general obligation bond funds used for a
14 public undertaking, improvement, or system designated by the
15 letter (D) shall have the bond principal and interest reimbursed
16 from the special fund in which the net revenue, or net user tax
17 receipts, or combination of both, of such public undertaking,
18 improvement or system, are deposited or credited. Bonds issued
19 for irrigation and housing projects shall be reimbursed as
20 provided by section 174-21 and chapter 201H, Hawaii Revised
21 Statutes, respectively.
22 The governor is authorized to use, at the governor's
23 discretion, the state highway fund, the harbor special fund, the
24 boating special fund, the airport revenue fund, the special land
25 and development fund, or other appropriate special funds to
BUF-01(25)

S.B. NO. 473
Page 135
1 finance the respective public undertaking, improvement, or
2 system described above and authorized in this Act, where the .
3 method of financing is designated to be general obligation bond
4 fund with debt service cost to be paid from the funds.
5 SECTION 23. In the event that the authorized
6 appropriations specified for a capital improvement project
7 listed in this Act are insufficient and where the source of
8 funding is designated as special funds, general obligation bond
9 fund with debt service cost to be paid from special funds,
10 revenue bond funds, or revolving funds, the governor may make
11 supplemental allotments from the special fund or revolving fund
12 responsible for cash or debt service payments for the projects,
13 or transfer unrequired balances from other unlapsed projects in
14 this Act or prior appropriation acts which authorized the use of
15 special funds, general obligation bond fund with debt service
16 costs to be paid from special funds, revenue bond funds, or
17 revolving funds; provided that such supplemental allotments
18 shall not be used to increase the scope of the project; and
19 provided further that such supplemental allotments shall not
20 impair the ability of the fund to meet the purposes for which it
21 was established.
22 SECTION 24. In the event that the authorized
23 appropriations specified for a capital improvement project
24 listed in this Act are insufficient and where the source of
25 funding is designated as airport passenger facility charge
BUF-01(25)

Page 136 S.B. NO. 173
1 funds, the governor may make supplemental allotments from the
2 airport revenue fund or airport revenue bond funds, or transfer
3 unrequired balances from other unlapsed projects in this Act or
4 prior appropriation acts that authorized the use of airport
5 passenger facility charge funds; provided further that such
6 supplemental allotments shall not be used to increase the scope
7 of the project; provided further that such supplemental
8 allotments shall not impair the ability of the fund to meet the
9 purposes for which it was established; and provided further that
10 the governor, at the governor's discretion, is authorized to
11 increase the passenger facility charge fund authorization
12 ceiling for the program to accommodate the expenditure of such
13 funds.
14 SECTION 25. The governor may supplement funds for any cost
15 element for a capital improvement project authorized under this
16 Act by transferring such sums as may be needed from the funds
17 appropriated for other cost elements of the same project by this
18 Act or any other prior or future act which has not lapsed;
19 provided that the total expenditure of funds for all cost
20 elements shall not exceed the total appropriations for that
21 project.
22 SECTION 26. Any provision of this Act to the contrary
23 notwithstanding, the appropriations made for capital improvement
24 projects authorized under this Act shall not lapse at the end of
25 the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made;
BUF-01(25)

Page 137 S.B. NO. 4173
1 provided that all appropriations made to be expended in fiscal
2 biennium 2025-2027 which are unencumbered as of June 30, 2028,
3 shall lapse as of that date; provided further that this lapsing
4 date shall not apply to non-general fund appropriations for
5 projects described in section 14 of this Act where such
6 appropriations have been deemed necessary to qualify for federal
7 aid financing and reimbursement and are unencumbered as of
8 June 30, 2032, shall lapse as of that date.
9 SECTION 27. Where it has been determined that changed
10 conditions, such as a reduction in the particular population
11 being served, permit the reduction in the scope of a capital
12 improvement project described in this Act, the governor may
13 authorize such reduction of project scope.
14 SECTION 28. In releasing funds for capital improvement
15 projects, the governor shall consider legislative intent and the
16 objectives of the user agency and its programs; the scope and
17 level of the user agency's intended service; and the means,
18 efficiency, and economics by which the project will meet the
19 objectives of the user agency and the State; provided further
20 that agencies responsible for construction shall take into
21 consideration legislative intent, the objectives of the user
22 agency and its programs, and the scope and level of the user
23 agency's intended service and construct the improvement to meet
24 the objectives of the user agency in the most efficient and
25 economical manner possible.
BUF-01(25)

Page 138 S.B. NO. 473
1 SECTION 29. With the approval of the governor, designated
2 expending agencies for capital improvement projects authorized
3 in this Act may delegate to other state or county agencies the
4 implementation of projects when it is determined advantageous to
5 do so by both the original expending agency and the agency to
6 which expending authority is to be delegated.
7 SECTION 30. Where county capital improvement projects are
8 partially or totally funded by state grants as authorized in
9 this Act or any other act of the legislature, this fact should
10 be appropriately acknowledged during construction and upon
11 completion of these projects.
12 SECTION 31. The governor may authorize the expenditure of
13 funds for capital improvement projects not previously authorized
14 in this Act to cope with the effects of natural disasters or
15 unforeseen emergencies, when the effects of the natural
16 disasters or unforeseen emergencies create an urgent need to
17 pursue a course of action that is in the best interest of the
18 State; provided further that no funds shall be expended without
19 a formal declaration of a natural disaster or emergency by the
20 governor; and provided further that the governor shall use the
21 powers conferred under section 127A-13, Hawaii Revised Statutes,
22 or any other applicable law to accomplish the purposes of this
23 section.
24 SECTION 32. Notwithstanding any provision in part III of
25 this Act, the governor is authorized to transfer savings or
BUF-01(25)

Page 139 S.B. NO. 773
1 unrequired balances as may be available from the appropriated
2 funds of any program in this Act to supplement the appropriation
3 for any other program in this Act to cope with the effects of
4 natural disasters or other unforeseen emergencies; provided that
5 the effects of such natural disasters or emergencies create an
6 urgent need to pursue a course of action which is in the best
7 interest of the State; provided further that the use of such
8 funds does not conflict with general law; and provided further
9 that no funds shall be expended without a formal declaration of
10 a natural disaster or emergency by the governor.
11 SECTION 33. No appropriation authorized in this Act for
12 expenditure by a political subdivision of this State shall be
13 considered to be a mandate to undertake new programs or to
14 increase the level of services under existing programs of that
15 political subdivision. If any appropriation authorized in this
16 Act constitutes such a mandate within the provisions of
17 section 5 of article VIII of the Hawaii State Constitution, such
18 authorization shall be void and, in the case of capital
19 improvement appropriations designated to be financed from the
20 general obligation bond fund, the total general obligation bonds
21 authorized for such projects shall be correspondingly decreased.
22 SECTION 34. Whenever the expending agency to which an
23 appropriation is made is changed due to legislation enacted
24 during any session of the legislature which affects the
25 appropriations made by this Act, the governor shall transfer the
BUF-01 (25)

Page 140 S.B. NO. 473
1 necessary funds and positions to the proper expending agency as
2 provided by law.
3 SECTION 35. In the event the State should assume the
4 direct operation of any non-governmental agency receiving state
5 funds under the provisions of this Act, all such funds shall
6 constitute a credit to the State against the costs of acquiring
7 all or any portion of the property, real, personal, or mixed, of
8 such non-governmental agency. This credit shall be applicable
9 regardless of when such acquisition takes place.
10 SECTION 36. Any provision of this Act to the contrary
11 notwithstanding, the federal fund or other federal fund
12 appropriations made for operating costs authorized under this
13 Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the
14 appropriation is made; provided that all federal fund or other
15 federal fund appropriations made to be expended in fiscal
16 year 2025-2026 which are unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall
17 lapse as of that date and fiscal year 2026-2027 which are
18 unencumbered as of June 30, 2029, shall lapse as of that date.
19 SECTION 37. If unanticipated federal funding cutbacks
20 diminish or curtail essential, federally-funded state programs,
21 the governor may utilize savings as determined to be available
22 from other state programs for the purpose of maintaining such
23 programs until the next legislative session.
24 SECTION 38. The governor may approve the expenditure of
25 all federal funds which are in excess of levels authorized by
BUF-01(25)

S.B. NO. 473
Page 141
1 the legislature; provided further that the governor may allow
2 for an increase in the appropriate federal fund authorization
3 ceiling for the program to accommodate the expenditure of such
4 funds.
5 SECTION 39. Any provision of this Act to the contrary
6 notwithstanding, the governor may approve the extension of the
7 lapse dates for federal fund or other federal fund
8 appropriations and appropriations of other means of financing,
9 except general funds, deemed necessary to qualify for federal
10 aid financing and/or reimbursement, provided in this Act or
11 authorized by the governor pursuant to section 38 of this Act as
12 necessary to meet the intent of the federal grant awards.
13 SECTION 40. Where an agency is authorized to secure funds
14 or other property from private organizations or individuals to
15 be expended or utilized in connection with any authorized
16 program, the agency, with the governor's approval, may enter
17 into such undertaking, provided that the provisions of the
18 undertaking comply with applicable state constitutional and
19 statutory requirements.
20 SECTION 41. Except as otherwise provided by general law,
21 negotiations for the purchase of land by state agencies shall be
22 subject to the approval of the governor and the department of
23 land and natural resources, or other appropriate agency;
24 provided further that private lands may be acquired for the
25 purpose of exchange for federal lands when the department of
BUF-01 (25)

Page 142 S.B. NO. 4/73
1 land and natural resources and the governor determine that such
2 acquisition and exchange are necessary for the completion of any
3 project specifically authorized by this Act.
4 SECTION 42. Except as otherwise provided, or except as
5 prohibited by specific grant conditions, all federal or
6 non-general fund reimbursements received by state programs shall
7 be returned to the general fund or fund of originating expenses.
8 SECTION 43. Unless otherwise provided in this Act, the
9 governor is authorized to transfer operating funds between
10 appropriations within the same fund, within an expending agency,
11 for operating purposes.
12 SECTION 44. Except as otherwise provided in this Act, each
13 department or agency is authorized to transfer positions within
14 its respective authorized position ceiling for the purpose of
15 maximizing the utilization of personnel resources and staff
16 productivity; provided further that all such actions shall be
17 with the prior approval of the governor and shall be consistent
18 with appropriations provided in this Act and with provisions of
19 part II of chapter 37, Hawaii Revised Statutes.
20 SECTION 45. Any law or provision to the contrary
21 notwithstanding, in expending funds for social welfare programs,
22 education programs, and other programs and agencies having
23 appropriations which are based on population and workload data
24 as specified in the executive budget document, only so much as
25 is necessary to provide the level of services intended by the
BUF-01(25)

S.B. NO. 473
Page 143
1 legislature shall be expended. Affected agencies shall reduce
2 expenditures below appropriations under procedures prescribed by
3 the department of budget and finance in the event actual
4 population and workload trends are less than the figures
5 projected.
6 SECTION 46. With the approval of the governor, agencies
7 that use appropriations authorized in part II of this Act for
8 audit services may delegate that responsibility and transfer
9 funds to the internal post audit program (AGS104), when it is
10 determined by such agencies that it is advantageous to do so.
11 SECTION 47. With the approval of the governor, expending
12 agencies that use operating appropriations authorized in part II
13 of this Act for planning, land acquisition, design,
14 construction, and equipment for repair and alterations may
15 delegate responsibility and transfer funds to public
16 works - planning, design and construction (AGS221) for the
17 implementation of the repair and alterations, when it is
18 determined by the agencies that it is advantageous to do so.
19 SECTION 48. Agencies with appropriations authorized in
20 part II of this Act for risk management costs shall transfer
21 funds authorized for that purpose to the state risk management
22 and insurance division (AGS203) for the administration and
23 implementation of state risk management costs and expenses,
24 except as otherwise provided by law.
BUF-01(25)

S.B. NO. 473
Page 144
1 SECTION 49. With the approval of the governor, the Hawaii
2 health systems corporation in the department of health may
3 transfer to the department of human services funds appropriated
4 to the Hawaii health systems corporation for the care and
5 treatment of patients, whenever the department of human services
6 can utilize such funds to match federal funds which may be
7 available to help finance the cost of outpatient, acute
8 hospital, or long-term care of indigents or medical indigents in
9 designated critical access hospitals.
10 SECTION 50. With the approval of the governor, the
11 department of health may transfer to the department of human
12 services funds appropriated to the department of health for the
13 care and treatment of patients, whenever the department of human
14 services can utilize such funds to match federal funds to
15 finance the cost of outpatient, hospital, or skilled nursing
16 home care of indigents or medical indigents.
17 SECTION 51. The department of human services is authorized
18 to enter into agreements with the department of health to
19 furnish outpatient, hospital, and skilled nursing home care of
20 indigents or medical indigents and to pay the department of
21 health for such care; provided that with the approval of the
22 director of finance, the department of health may deposit part
23 of such receipts into the appropriations from which transfers
24 were made as provided elsewhere in this Act.
BUF-01(25)

S.B. NO. 473
Page 145
1 SECTION 52. Provided that of the appropriation for each
2 principal state department as defined by section 26-4, Hawaii
3 Revised Statutes, except for the department of transportation,
4 the sum of $2,500 for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the sum of
5 $2,500 in fiscal year 2026-2027, and for the department of
6 transportation, the sum of $7,500 for fiscal year 2025-2026 and
7 the sum of $7,500 in fiscal year 2026-2027, shall be made
8 available in each department to be established as a separate
9 account for a protocol fund to be expended at the discretion of
10 the executive head of the department or agency (i.e., director,
11 chairperson, comptroller, adjutant general, superintendent,
12 president, or attorney general).
13 SECTION 53. Provided that of the general fund
14 appropriation for Hawaii state public library system (EDN407),
15 the sum of $2,500 for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the sum of
16 $2,500 for fiscal year 2026-2027 may be used to establish a
17 separate protocol account to be expended at the discretion of
18 the state librarian.
19 SECTION 54. Provided that of the general fund
20 appropriation for financial administration (BUF115), the sum of
21 $4,000 for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the sum of $4,000 for
22 fiscal year 2026-2027 may be used to establish a separate
23 protocol account to be expended at the discretion of the
24 director of finance for the promotion and improvement of state
25 bond ratings and sales.
BUF-01(25)

Page 146 S.B.NO. 473
1 SECTION 55. Provided that of the special fund
2 appropriation for spectator events and shows - aloha stadium
3 (BED180), the sum of $2,500 for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the
4 sum of $2,500 for fiscal year 2026-2027 may be expended at the
5 discretion of the stadium manager for stadium-related purposes.
6 SECTION 56. Except as otherwise provided, the
7 appropriation for the office of the governor (GOV100) shall be
8 expended at the discretion of the governor.
9 SECTION 57. Except as otherwise provided, the
10 appropriation for the office of the lieutenant governor (LTG100)
11 shall be expended at the discretion of the lieutenant governor.
12 SECTION 58. The director of finance is authorized to
13 expend general fund, special fund, and revolving fund savings or
14 balances determined to be available from authorized general
15 fund, special fund, and revolving fund program appropriations,
16 up to an aggregate total of $50,000,000 for fiscal
17 year 2025-2026 and $50,000,000 for fiscal year 2026-2027, for
18 municipal lease payments under financing agreements entered into
19 pursuant to chapter 37D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, to finance the
20 acquisition of depreciable assets, including, but not limited
21 to, automobiles, computers, printers, and telecommunications
22 equipment; and provided further that designated expending
23 agencies (including the department of education and the
24 University of Hawaii) for municipal lease payments and for
25 depreciable assets, including, but not limited to, automobiles,
BUF-01(25)

S.B. NO. 473
Page 147
1 computers, printers, and telecommunications equipment authorized
2 in this Act may delegate to the director of finance the
3 implementation of such acquisitions when it is determined by all
4 involved agencies that it is advantageous to do so.
5 SECTION 59. Notwithstanding any provision in part III of
6 this Act, the governor is authorized to transfer savings or
7 unrequired balances as may be available of general funds from
8 any program in this Act to supplement the department of land and
9 natural resources' fire-fighter's contingency fund; provided
10 further that these funds shall be used to prevent, control, and
11 extinguish wildland fires within forest reserves, public hunting
12 areas, wildlife and plant sanctuaries, and natural area
13 reserves, and to fulfill mutual aid agreements in cooperation
14 with fire control agencies of the counties and federal
15 government.
16 SECTION 60. Provided that the director of finance shall
17 ensure that non-facility per pupil general fund amounts
18 allocated for department of education and charter school
19 students are equal on an annualized fiscal year basis; provided
20 further that, for the purposes of this section, all general fund
21 appropriations for school-based budgeting (EDN100) ,
22 instructional support (EDN200), state administration (EDN300),
23 and school support (EDN400) shall be considered non-facility
24 appropriations for the department of education; provided further
25 that for the purposes of this section, the general fund
BUF-01(25)

Page 148 S.B. NO. 473
1 appropriation for charter schools (EDN600) shall be considered
2 the non-facility appropriation for charter schools; provided
3 further that, for the purposes of this section, all grant
4 appropriations issued pursuant to chapter 42F, Hawaii Revised
5 Statutes, shall be excluded from non-facility appropriations for
6 the department of education and charter schools; and provided
7 further that, notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, for
8 fiscal year 2025-2026 and fiscal year 2026-2027, the director of
9 finance shall:
10 (1) Determine the sum of general fund appropriations made for
11 the department of education and charter school student
12 non-facility costs;
13 (2) Determine the sum of department of education and charter
14 school student enrollment based upon verified actual
15 student enrollment counts as of October 15;
16 (3) Determine a per pupil amount by dividing the sum of general
17 fund appropriations determined under paragraph (1) by the
18 sum of student enrollment determined under paragraph (2);
19 (4) Transfer a general fund amount between the department of
20 education and charter schools prior to November 1, 2025,
21 and November 1, 2026, respectively, that will provide each
22 with a per pupil allocation equal to the amount determined
23 on an annualized fiscal year basis under paragraph (3); and
24 (5) Account for all calculations and transfers made pursuant to
25 this section in a report to the legislature, governor,
BUF-01(25)

Page 149 S.B. NO. 475
1 department of education, and charter schools within ten
2 days of any transfer made pursuant to this section.
3 PART VIII. MISCELLANEOUS AND EFFECTIVE DATE
4 SECTION 61. If any portion of this Act or its application
5 to any person, entity, or circumstance is held to be invalid for
6 any reason, then the legislature declares that the remainder of
7 the Act and each and every other provision thereof shall not be
8 affected thereby. If any portion of a specific appropriation is
9 held to be invalid for any reason, the remaining portion shall
10 be expended to fulfill the objective of such appropriation to
11 the extent possible.
12 SECTION 62. In the event manifest clerical, typographical
13 or other mechanical errors are found in this Act, the governor
14 is hereby authorized to correct such errors.
15 SECTION 63. Material to be repealed is bracketed and
16 stricken. New material in prior enacted laws is underscored.
17 SECTION 64. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
18
19 INTRODUCED BY:
20 BY REQUEST
BUF-01 (25)

S.B. NO. 473